







Team - Marquee Brands






















































Team

A team of globalexperience






Marquee BrandsManagement Michael DeVirgilio, President of Marquee Brands LLC and member of the Marquee Brands Board of Managers.Prior to joining Marquee Brands, Mr. DeVirgilio was President of Licensing & International at Kenneth Cole Productions, a role he held since February 2009.  In this capacity, he led multiple teams charged with driving revenue through diverse business strategies, including licensing the Kenneth Cole brand across various product categories and channels in the US. Mr. DeVirgilio also led the expansion of the Kenneth Cole brand in 80+ countries and managed corporate strategic projects that focused on delivering alternative revenue streams unrelated to the Kenneth Cole brand. Mr. DeVirgilio spent 17 years with Kenneth Cole.Prior to joining Kenneth Cole Productions, Mr. DeVirgilio served as Director of Merchandising at the Joseph & Feiss Company (a Division of Hugo Boss, USA). Mr. DeVirgilio also held various sales and merchandising functions within both Hugo Boss USA and Hartmarx Corporation. Cory M. Baker, Chief Operating Officer of Marquee Brands LLC and member of the Marquee Brands Board of Managers.Prior to joining Marquee Brands, Mr. Baker was Principal & Founder of Julian Wolf, a brand management & business development agency.  Before founding Julian Wolf in 2013, Mr. Baker was the Managing Director of Brand Strategy and Development at Infinity Lifestyle Brands, heading up the company's brands division and overseeing all licensing, marketing, strategy, and development for the private equity portfolio.Mr. Baker also served as Vice President of Business Affairs at Iconix Brand Group, Inc., where his role on the management team included closing on over $1 billion in brand acquisitions and joint ventures and growing the portfolio from 12 to 24 global brands.  At Iconix, Mr. Baker also helped strategize the company’s international marketing and brand management to develop cross-brand licensing expansion programs for the entire roster, including major national brands such as Joe Boxer, Starter, Candies, Badgley Mischka, and OP. Mr. Baker began his career in intellectual property law focused in film, music, television, fashion, and hospitality where he played instrumental roles in brand extension programs. Warren Clamen, Chief Financial Officer of Marquee Brands LLC and member of the Marquee Brands Board of Managers.Prior to joining Marquee Brands, Mr. Clamen was Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Iconix Brand Group from March 2005 to March 2014. Mr. Clamen joined Iconix to transform the company from a traditional operating company with three brands into the first pure-play brand management company. During his tenure, the company acquired 31 iconic consumer brands, the market cap grew from approximately $200 million to over $2 billion and annual royalty revenue increased from approximately $30 million to $430 million. In addition, Mr. Clamen led numerous equity and capital market transactions totaling nearly $3 billion. Prior to Iconix, Mr. Clamen spent three years at Columbia House as Vice President Finance, a Company owned by Blackstone at the time. Prior to Columbia House, he served as Vice President Finance at Marvel Entertainment. Mr. Clamen started his career in public accounting, spending nine years at a nationally recognized Canadian public accounting firm. He holds his Certified Public Accounting designation both in the US and in Canada. Mia Rothstein, Senior Vice President of Brand Management at Marquee Brands LLC.Prior to joining the company, Ms. Rothstein served as Vice President of Brand Management at Iconix Brand Group since 2011, and held various titles in their Brand Management and Merchandising division since joining the company in 2006. During her tenure at Iconix, Ms. Rothstein oversaw all points of business across 12 brands within their portfolio ranging from Luxury to Mass. She drove product development efforts to create innovative, functional and relevant collections for all distribution channels, and played a key role in successfully launching several direct to retail partnerships for Badgley Mischka, London Fog, Danskin, Candies and Material Girl.  She was also integral in implementing new brand strategies for the company, and grew their licensing program both internationally and across fashion, beauty and home. Ms. Rothstein began her career in the specialty retail sector where she held buying and product development positions at the Aldo Group, Le Chateau, Vince Camuto and Steve Madden. Neuberger BermanPrivate Equity Team Samuel Porat, Managing Director of Neuberger Berman. He is a member of the Marquee Brands Board of Managers.Mr. Port also serves on the Athyrium Investment Committee and Athyrium Investment Team, a credit strategy focused on the healthcare sector. Prior to joining Neuberger Berman in 2004, Mr. Porat worked in the Lehman Brothers Investment Banking Division in New York, where he focused on corporate financings and strategic advisory across several industries. In addition, Mr. Porat was the Director of Strategic Planning at Alfy.com, a media startup from 1999 - 2001. Mr. Porat holds an M.B.A. with honors from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania and a B.A. with distinction from Yale University. Zachary P. Sigel, Managing Director of Neuberger Berman. He is a member of the Marquee Brands Board of Managers and leads Marquee Brands' acquisition strategy.Mr. Sigel has been with Neuberger Berman Private Equity since 2007, where he has focused on all aspects of consumer investing across the private equity platform. Prior to joining Neuberger Berman in 2007, Mr. Sigel worked as a Consumer Equity Research Analyst at Lehman Brothers where he was responsible for covering public equities in the Consumer Staples sector. Mr. Sigel graduated magna cum laude with a B.A. in finance from The George Washington University. David Zolot, Principal of Neuberger Berman dedicated to Marquee Brands.Prior to joining Neuberger Berman Private Equity, Mr. Zolot was a Senior Vice President of Corporate Development at Saban Brands Lifestyle Group where he oversaw new brand acquisitions and corporate finance initiatives. Previously, Mr. Zolot was a Vice President of Strategic Development at brand management company, Iconix Brand Group. From 2004 - 2011, Nr. Zolot was at Peter J. Solomon, a preeminent private investment banking firm focused on the apparel, retail and consumer products industries. Mr. Zolot holds a Bachelor's Degree in Business Administration from the University of Michigan Undergraduate Business School. Jackie Fish, Associate of Neuberger Berman and is dedicated to Marquee Brands.Prior to joining Neuberger Berman Private Equity, Ms. Fish worked for two years in Mergers & Acquisitions Investment Banking at Jefferies, where she advised clients on M&A transactions across various industry verticals. Ms. Fish graduated from University of Michigan with a Bachelor of Business Administration with High Distinction.  Kevin Chiu, Associate at Neuberger Berman and is dedicated to Marquee Brands.Prior to joining Neuberger Berman Private Equity, Mr. Chiu worked for two years in Media & Telecom Investment Banking at Citi, where he advised clients on numerous M&A and financing transactions. Mr. Chiu graduated from Yale University with a B.A. in Economics with distinction.



















Marquee Brands















































































Hello
 
Taking quality brands to new global heights

SCROLL DOWN





Hello
 
Taking quality brands to new global heights


THE COMPANYWe are brand focused, product oriented and globally minded strategists, defining ourselves with an international plan to growing relevant brands.










Reaching New Audiences
 
Reaching New Audiences






Reaching New Audiences
 
Reaching New Audiences


HOW WE DO ITRelying on our global network of partners, we extend each brand through new retail distribution, product expansion and territory growth. We provide support through impactful marketing and consumer engagement.










Our Brands
 
Meet our Brands






Our Brands
 
Meet our Brands










































Official website 









Official website 









OFFICIAL WEBSITE 










News
 
News






News
 
News


MARQUEE BRANDS LLC ANNOUNCES ACQUISITION OF BODY GLOVE® AND RELATED INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY ASSETS FROM BODY GLOVE INTERNATIONALNEW YORK - November 2, 2016Established in Redondo Beach, California in 1953, by twin brothers Bob and Bill Meistrell, Body Glove has grown into one of the most revered and treasured outdoor sports brands across global markets and a wide array of lifestyle product categories. From its humble beginnings as a pioneer in wetsuit technology to a history steeped in surf and adventure, generation after generation continue to make Body Glove a staple both in and out of the water.



















BEN SHERMAN® ANNOUNCES KIDS COLLECTION FOR FALL/WINTER 2016NEW YORK - JULY 14, 2016Ben Sherman is set to increase distribution of it’s quirky and fun Ben Sherman Kids collection this Fall/Winter 2016.







BRUNO MAGLI ANNOUNCES TWO NEW PARTNERSHIPSNEW YORK - JULY 13, 2016Bruno Magli has announced two new partnerships in Asia with Sitoy Retailing Ltd. in China and Bruno Magli Partners Co., Ltd. in Japan.

















 Stock Quotes and Investment Research  -- Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 











Greenmont Capital Partners | 

























































Greenmont Capital has been making Impact investments in high growth consumer products since 2004. In 2008, Greenmont II became a GIIRS Pioneer Fund, B LAB's comprehensive rating system of a fund's social and environmental impact. Our operations are strategically located in Boulder, Colorado, a city widely regarded as the epicenter of the natural products industry.




 



 



 



 



 



 









CRITERIA
Greenmont II management seeks investment opportunities in companies that are…



Consumer Products
Companies that are producing branded consumer products.



LOHAS market
Clearly aligned with the Lifestyles of Health and Sustainability (LOHAS) market.



Growth Stage
Growth Stage with realized trailing 12-month revenue of $3 million or more.



Based in the U.S.
Companies that are based in the United States.



Privately held
Companies that are privately held.
 



Seeking Investment
Seeking an equity investment of $1-5 million.



If you represent a company that fits this profile, contact us to learn more or submit your proposal materials now.





MANAGEMENT TEAM




 

Todd Woloson
Managing Director
Todd Woloson became a Managing Director of Greenmont Capital Partners II in 2007 and represents the Fund on the Boards of Directors of Madhava Natural Sweeteners, Door to Door Organics, Inc., Uncle Matt’s Organic, Inc., and, previously, Eco-Products, Inc., prior to its exit to WNA in November 2012. Todd began his career with Proctor & Gamble in 1989, but soon became a serial entrepreneur. After graduating from the University of Denver Law School in 1994, he successfully completed an environmental service rollup, which led to a career as a venture capitalist. In 1996, Todd co-founded Canyon Capital, an early-stage venture fund. As a Managing Partner, he was intimately involved with the development of a wide range of software, Internet and consumer product companies. Also in 1996, Todd co-founded Global Education Fund (“GEF”), a non-profit organization building libraries in developing countries. To date, GEF has created 53 libraries and literacy centers in 21 countries throughout the world. In 2002, Todd co-founded IZZE Beverage Company. IZZE manufactures and markets a line of all-natural sparkling fruit juices available at Whole Foods Markets, Wild Oats Marketplace, Starbucks, Target, Costco and a wide variety of independent locations. Todd served as President and CEO of IZZE until its sale to PepsiCo in 2006 and was a recipient of the 2003 Entrepreneur of the Year Award by Ernst & Young. He received a B.A. degree from St. Lawrence University in New York and a J.D. from the University of Denver Law School.






 

David Haynes
Managing Director
David Haynes became a Managing Director for Greenmont Capital Partners II at the time of its September 2007 inception and currently represents the Fund on the Boards of Madhava Natural Sweeteners and Door to Door Organics, Inc. For the prior 11 years, he served as founder and CEO of multiple start-ups in California and Colorado. In 1996, David founded AudioBase, Inc., a streaming media company located in Sausalito, California, and served as Chairman and CEO throughout his tenure. During that time, he raised $30 million from strategic and financial investors including Bay Partners, Mr. Charles R. Schwab, Hambrecht & Quist (now JPMorgan Partners), Sony Music Entertainment and Texas Pacific Group. David was responsible for recruiting the company’s Board of Directors including Charles R. Schwab, CEO and founder of Charles Schwab; John Freidenrich, founder of Bay Partners and Gray, Cary, Ware & Freidenrich; and the Board of Advisors including John Sculley, former CEO of PepsiCo and Apple Computers; and G.M. O’Connell, Founder and CEO of Modem Media. David sold AudioBase in 2002. From 2003 to 2004, he worked directly for Mr. Charles R. Schwab to research “edutainment” properties of children with learning differences. David went on to co-found Hybrid Energy Group in 2005, focusing on community-based renewable energy projects. Most recently, he served as an Entrepreneur-in-Residence at Boulder Ventures, a venture capital firm with $300 million under management. Prior to his entrepreneurial endeavors, David worked for Volpe Welty & Co., an investment bank located in San Francisco, and, earlier, for Raymond James Financial and Prudential Securities. He holds a B.A. degree from the University of New Hampshire.








Venture Partners
Partners
Barney Feinblum
John Shields
Mark Retzloff
Michelle Goolsby
S.M. (Hass) Hassan










Portfolio





 

 




madhava
Madhava Natural Sweeteners is dedicated to bringing you the highest quality natural sweeteners on the planet.






 

 




EcoSMART
Acquired by Kittrich Co. November, 2014.






 

 




Door to Door Organics
Door to Door Organics makes online grocery shopping easy by quickly delivering fresh, organic produce & local groceries to your home or office.






 

 




Uncle Matt’s Organic
We’re the nation’s original organic orange juice company, and we’re committed to growing a healthy generation through organic farming.






 

 




Eco Products
Acquired by Waddington North America in November 2012.





















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version















Real Estate Holdings Company | GreenPointe Holdings











About Us
Communities
Golf
News
Giving Back
Contact












GreenPointe Holdings, LLC is a diversified holding company that brings together the necessary disciplines to create sustainable, high-value communities built upon intelligent green principles, advanced technologies and solid financial structures.


Communities

GreenPointe Communities is the community development division of GreenPointe Holdings acquiring and developing super communities in Florida. 



Homes

GreenPointe Homes is the homebuilding division of GreenPointe Holdings creating homes of lasting value by utilizing intelligent green building practices, technologies and products. 



Lifestyle

Hampton Golf & Lifestyles is an affiliated company of GreenPointe Holdings and is the Southeast's premier golf course and residential community lifestyle management firm. 






904.996.2485




Home
|
About Us
|
Communities
|
Homes
|
Golf
|
News
|
Giving Back
|
Contact


       		©2014 GreenPointe Holdings. All rights reserved.
       








MUTUAL:DYN5220 Mutual Fund - Marquis-Growth-Portfolio Summary - Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 






























 



 Neuberger Berman Private Equity Closes On Marquee Brands Partners LP 
         










    










 






 











 









Neuberger Berman Private Equity Closes On Marquee Brands Partners LP

Feb 11, 2016, 12:00 ET
		  		  																
						 from   Neuberger Berman 











 
















































 

 















































 

 

 
 
 
 







Neuberger Berman, founded in 1939, is a private, independent, employee-owned investment manager. The firm manages equities, fixed income, private equity and hedge fund portfolios for institutions and advisors worldwide. With offices in 18 ...    
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




Neuberger Berman, founded in 1939, is a private, independent, employee-owned investment manager. The firm manages equities, fixed income, private equity and hedge fund portfolios for institutions and advisors worldwide. With offices in 18 countries, Neuberger Berman's team is more than 2,100 professionals. Tenured, stable and long-term in focus, the firm fosters an investment culture of fundamental research and independent thinking. For more information, please visit our website at www.nb.com.
 


 

 




 





 


NEW YORK, Feb. 11, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Neuberger Berman, a private, independent, employee-owned investment manager, is pleased to announce the close of Marquee Brands Partners LP, a $462 million fund that seeks to acquire high-quality, U.S. and European brands, with strong consumer awareness and opportunities for growth in various consumer sectors including apparel, footwear, accessories, health & beauty, entertainment, food & beverage and home products. The fund was oversubscribed, exceeding its target of $400 million. Marquee Brands has made two acquisitions to date in Bruno Magli®, the luxury Italian footwear brand, and Ben Sherman®, the iconic British fashion brand. Marquee's global investor base is comprised of more than 20 institutions, including public and private pensions, insurance companies and foundations from North America, Europe, the Middle East and Japan.
Marquee's investment team is led by Samuel Porat, a Managing Director of Neuberger Berman, and Zachary Sigel, a Principal of Neuberger Berman. Mr. Porat and Mr. Sigel also founded the fund's operating subsidiary, Marquee Brands LLC along with its management and operating executives, Michael DeVirgilio and Cory M. Baker. Together they have assembled a team of experienced executives from the fashion, retail and licensing industries. "We believe that Marquee's strategy of acquiring leading consumer brands with strong growth opportunities provides our investors with a potential attractive source of yield and capital appreciation," said Samuel Porat, adding that "our investors, faced with twin challenges of a volatile market and persistently low-rate environment, are seeking alternative sources of income and return and intellectual property such as consumer brands can benefit their investment portfolios."  
"We look forward to continuing to build a diversified portfolio of high-quality brands that we can grow organically through impactful marketing, geographic expansion and increased product offerings with our partners," stated Zachary Sigel who also oversees Marquee's acquisitions. "We believe the large committed capital base from our investors, Neuberger Berman's global network, and our strong management team makes Marquee one of the best capitalized and strategically positioned competitors in the consumer brand acquisition, licensing and management business."
About Neuberger Berman
Neuberger Berman, founded in 1939, is a private, independent, employee-owned investment manager. The firm manages equities, fixed income, private equity and hedge fund portfolios for institutions and advisors worldwide. With offices in 19 countries, Neuberger Berman's team is more than 2,100 professionals and the company was named by Pensions & Investments as a 2013, 2014 and 2015 Best Place to Work in Money Management. Tenured, stable and long-term in focus, the firm fosters an investment culture of fundamental research and independent thinking. It manages $240 billion in client assets as of December 31, 2015. For more information, please visit our website at www.nb.com.
About Marquee Brands LLC
Marquee Brands LLC is a brand acquisition, licensing and development company. Sponsored by Neuberger Berman Private Equity, a business of Neuberger Berman, one of the world's leading employee-owned investment managers, Marquee Brands targets high quality brands with strong consumer awareness and long-term growth potential. Marquee Brands seeks to identify brands in various consumer product segments with the goal of expanding their reach across retail channel, geography and product category while preserving the brand heritage and enhancing the ultimate consumer experience. Through its global team of professionals and partners, Marquee Brands monitors trends and markets in order to grow and manage brands in partnership with retailers, licensees and manufacturers through engaging, impactful marketing and strategic planning. www.marqueebrands.com
All information is as of December 31, 2015 unless otherwise indicated and is subject to change without notice.  Firm data, including employee and assets under management figures, reflects collective data for the various affiliated investment advisers that are subsidiaries of Neuberger Berman Group LLC.  Firm history dates back to the 1939 founding of Neuberger & Berman (the predecessor to Neuberger Berman LLC).  
This material is being issued on a limited basis through various global subsidiaries and affiliates of Neuberger Berman Group LLC. Please visit www.nb.com/disclosure-global-communications for the specific entities and jurisdictional limitations and restrictions.
The "Neuberger Berman" name and logo are registered service marks of Neuberger Berman Group LLC.  
© 2016 Neuberger Berman Group LLC. All rights reserved.
Media Contacts: 
For Neuberger Berman: Alex Samuelson, 212 476 5392, Alexander.Samuelson@NB.com For Marquee Brands: Amanda Greenberg, 954 599 6060, Amanda@domainintegrated.com 
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20121010/MM90850LOGO 
 SOURCE  Neuberger Berman  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.nb.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  
















Feb 16, 2016, 19:58 ET
Preview: Neuberger Berman Closed-End Intermediate Municipal Funds Announce Monthly Distributions




















Jan 29, 2016, 17:59 ET
Preview: Neuberger Berman High Yield Strategies Fund Announces Monthly Distribution








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Read More











Jul 17, 2017, 16:30 ET
Neuberger Berman Closes $450 Million CLO Risk Retention Vehicle














Jul 17, 2017, 16:30 ET
Neuberger Berman Adds To China Equity Capabilities With New...














Jul 17, 2017, 16:30 ET
Neuberger Berman Closed-End Intermediate Municipal Funds Announce...











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 



























































15th Annual US Real Estate Opportunity and Private Fund Investing Forum -> Agenda

















IMN HOME
DIVISION HOME









15th Annual

                     US Real Estate Opportunity and Private Fund Investing Forum
                


                                            June 12-13, 2014
                       
                







Agenda



Thursday, June 12th, 2014
Friday, June 13th, 2014
My Agenda
 


To view your agenda you must be signed in





8:54 PM  Registration… Breakfast Courtesy of 













8:54 PM  Opening Remarks by IMN & Conference Chair: 






Bruce Stachenfeld
 
Managing Partner
Duval & Stachenfeld
 










8:54 PM  Economist Keynote: In Light of the Changes in the Market are Inflation Expectations too High? 






Peter Linneman
 
Principal
Linneman Associates
 










9:05 AM  State of the Fund & Real Estate Industry 


                            • Impact of SEC filings & other new regulations • Fund-of-funds, consultants and LPs • The GSE’s: Anything new? • What is the downside? • Pending debt maturities • Do you expect a round of consolidation? • Working with small funds • E-commerce impact • The rise of the secondary market • International $$ coming into the US • Impact of rising cap rates • Are you expanding into debt? • International investments • Return expectations
                            







Robert Ivanhoe
 
Chairman, Global Real Estate Practice
Greenberg Traurig, LLP
 





Adam Brooks
 
MD, Real Estate Investments
AllianceBernstein
 





Randy Zisler
 
Chief Investment Officer
Encore Enterprises
 





Leslie Wohlman Himmel
 
Partner
Himmel + Meringoff Properties
 





Robert Dombi
 
Partner
Landmark Partners
 





Leonard Klehr
 
Vice Chairman
Lubert-Adler Partners, LP
 





Joseph Sitt
 
President
Thor Equities, LLC
 










10:05 AM  Refreshments Courtesy of 













8:54 PM  The Large Fund Panel… What are the Risks that you are Taking in this so Called Growth Environment? 


                            • The slope of the yield curve and what it means for CRE • Which sectors are over-heated? • Global vs. secondary cities? • Are there enough deals for all the capital available? • Construction • New asset types you are considering • How are you playing the rolling recovery… What are you rolling into? Rolling out of? • Buying from the government • Residential… Is there still value? • Taking advantage of the US energy sector
                            







Marc Davidson
 
Managing Director and Portfolio Manager
AEW Capital Management, L.P.
 





Reid Liffmann
 
Managing Director
Angelo, Gordon & Co.
 





Tom Shapiro
 
President & CIO
GTIS Partners
 





Todd Bassen
 
Director-Acquisitions
Invesco
 





Justin Guichard
 
Managing Director
Oaktree Capital Management
 





Matt Gross
 
Principal
Walton Street Capital, LLC
 










8:54 PM  Where Should you be… Reassessing Core vs. Value-Added vs. Opportunistic Investing for 2015 


                            • The changing picture of risk/return for different styles • Comparing leverage levels • Looking at oxymorons… core development, core secondary markets • Current risk/return objectives • Future performance predictions • Definining core +
                            







David Kessler
 
Partner, National Director-Commercial Real Estate
CohnReznick LLP
 





Michael Happel
 
Managing Director
American Realty Capital
 





Josh Cleveland
 
Partner
StepStone Group LP
 





Paul Vosper
 
COO and Co-Head-Real Estate
Morgan Stanley Alternative Investment Partners
 





Robert Gray
 
Managing Partner
TerraCap Management
 





Bahram Motamedian
 
Managing Director
USAA Real Estate Company
 










8:54 PM  Luncheon Courtesy of 












Please Choose "A, B or C"









8:54 PM  Fundraising… Are the Headwinds Easing a Bit? 


                            • Fundraising for non-commingled funds… Has it continued to rise? • Syndication vs. fundraising • Being successful with a dual fundraise • Success of funds expanding their strategy from their last mandate • How long can you expect to be in fundraising mode? • First time fundraising environment • Sector specific vs. more general funds • Think different… How important is it in an investment strategy?
                            







Michael Glazer
 
Partner
Goodwin Procter LLP
 





Michael Happel
 
Managing Director
American Realty Capital
 





Rayenne Chen
 
Principal, Director of Investor Relations
Exeter Property Group
 





Frank Wuest
 
Division President
Forest City Enterprises
 





Ronald Dickerman
 
President & Founder
Madison International Realty
 





Alan Pardee
 
Managing Partner
Mercury Capital Advisors
 










8:54 PM  Fund-Fund Joint Ventures 


                            • Tax-efficient structuring • Choosing the form of entity • Joint ventures with non-US partners • Control issues, dispute resolution and the decision making process • Capital contributions if additional capital is needed • Exiting fund investments
                            







Dennis Russo
 
Chair of New York Real Estate
BakerHostetler
 





Gregg Bloomberg
 
Partner
CohnReznick LLP
 





Michael Gallerstein
 
Principal
Equity Resource Investments
 





Jason Maxwell
 
General Counsel
Hines Advisors Limited Partnership
 





Charles Harrison
 
President
REIT Funding, LLC
 





John Balboni
 
Partner
Sullivan & Worcester LLP
 










8:54 PM  Industry Consolidation & Take Private Deals: What is Happening that is Not in the Headlines? 


                            • What is triggering the consolidation? • Cost of expanding internally vs. externally vs. other options • Multiple parties buying one • Looking at international partners • Are large sponsors looking to reduce their number of advisors? • Unintended consequences to be aware of • Sale to REITs • Acquiring a joint venture partner’s interest
                            







Joseph Smith
 
Partner
Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP
 





Caroline McBride
 
Co-Founder and Chief Investment Officer
Forum Partners Investment Management LLC
 





Tyler Morse
 
Chief Executive Officer
MCR Development LLC
 





Doug Lee
 
Managing Director and Head of Capital Market
ExcelCore
 





Bob Sonnenblick
 
Principal
Sonnenblick Development, LLC
 










8:54 PM  Acquisition Due Diligence for Individual Properties and Portfolios 


                            • Do you perform a worse-case analysis? • Figuring out what you don’t know and what’s not there • Due diligence on partnerships • The best deal you walked away from • Due diligence on 100s of loans quickly • Pricing • Government portfolios • Loans vs. property
                            







Jordan Metzger
 
Member
Cole Schotz, PC
 





Andrew Borsanyi
 
Principal
The Concord Group, LLC
 





Todd Eisner
 
Real Estate Partner
Duval & Stachenfeld
 





Neal Johnson
 
Managing Partner
Isles Ranch Partners
 





Jeffrey Alpaugh
 
Managing Director, Global Real Estate & Hospitality Practice Leader
Marsh & McLennan Companies, Inc.
 





Christopher Schlank
 
Managing Partner & Co-Founder
Savanna
 





Jason Baker
 
Acquisitions Director - Eastern Region
STRS Ohio
 









 The Financing/Debt Discussions at IMN’s Opportunity Fund Forum


                            See the latest private fund real estate financing strategies at The Financing/Debt Symposium at IMNs Opportunity Fund Forum will be. The next 7 sessions, all related to investing in fixed income or underwriting real estate debt will be taking place in track “B”. If you are a debt provider, broker, fund or investor & want to meet the top funds and hear how they are financing or providing debt this is a must attend plenary
                            










8:54 PM  Bridge Loans & Other High Yield Lending on Transitional Properties, Deals with a Value-Added
Component, Secondary & Tertiary Markets 


                            • Are you seeing competition from banks on any of your high-yield products? • Are funds entering this space dropping rates? Where have they dropped too much for your comfort? • Where and what food groups are your sweet spots? • Is there any high yiel
                            







Tom O'Connor
 
Partner and Chair of Real Estate Finance Group
Duval & Stachenfeld
 





Roger Cozzi
 
CIO - Commercial Real Estate Lending
AllianceBernstein
 





Dan Hartman
 
Principal
Ares Management, LLC
 





Jerry Dunn
 
Chief Executive Officer and Principal
A10 Capital
 





Patrick Walsh
 
SVP, Commercial and Industrial Lending
Bofi Federal Bank
 





Brett Forman
 
President
Forman Capital, LLC
 





Sujan Patel
 
Co-Head of US Investment Management
Colony NorthStar
 










8:54 PM  Hotels: Where will you be investing in 2015? 


                            • How much of your fund invests in hotels? Do you see this level increasing? • Fundraising outlook for hotels • Performance of hotel investments • Where do you see the greatest opportunities for hotel investment? Domestic vs. international plays • Product type… Are you looking towards high end vs. mid-market? • Opportunities in funds financing and recapitalizing hotels
                            







Deborah Friedland
 
Director - Hospitality Services
EisnerAmper LLP
 





Ali Elam
 
Managing Director
Fortress Investment Group
 





Austin Khan
 
Chief Investment Officer
Ethika Investments, LLC
 





Clark Hanrattie
 
Principal & Chief Financial Officer
HEI Hotels & Resorts
 





Jeffrey Dauray
 
Senior Vice President-Acquisitions
RLJ Lodging Trust
 





Christopher Diffley
 
Managing Director
RockBridge Capital, LLC
 










8:54 PM  Gaining Access to Foreign Capital: Including EB-5-Related Fundraising 


                            • How are you reaching foreign investors? • Are AIFMD compliance important? • EB-5 Financing • FIRPTA considerations • Catching the big fish… How to approach a Sovereign • Shariah compliant structures • The joint venture structure • Accessing Latin capital… Can it work outside of South Florida? • EB-5… What qualifies? • Role of EB-5 “finders”
                            







Ali Jahangiri
 
President
EB5Investors.com
 





George Ekins
 
Principal
American Dream Fund, LLC
 





David Hirson
 
Partner
Fragomen, Del Rey, Bernsen, and Loewy LLP
 





Ishan Singh
 
Managing Director
REV-Re Capital Ventures
 










8:54 PM  New Mezz Loan Origination/Borrowing 


                            • How do you look at construction vs. acquisition vs. recapitalization • What won’t you finance? • Distinguishing yourself in an increasingly competitive market • 2014… Working with senior lenders • Are you selling any of your loans? Why?
                            







Mark Fawer
 
Partner
Arent Fox LLP
 





Christopher Reilly
 
Head of Debt Origination
Brookfield Real Estate Financial Partners, LLC
 





James Henderson
 
Managing Director-Alternative Investments Group
Cornerstone Real Estate Advisers LLC
 





David Broderick
 
Partner
Latham & Watkins
 





Richard Mandel
 
President
Ramsfield Hospitality Finance
 





Seth Singerman
 
President
Singerman Real Estate, LLC
 










8:54 PM  Joint Ventures… Today’s Deals 


                            • LP vs. Partner interests • Construction partnerships • Waterfalls and current terms • Did the downturn expose a laxness in due diligence and documentation? • Is operational due diligence becoming a more prominent feature at the front end of partnership negotiations? • What are you doing to monitor your partner? • Have you implemented an anti-corruption program? • Non-U.S. partnerships • Evaluating a manager’s performance • What kind of cost leakages have you seen from partners? How can you prevent them?
                            







Terri Adler
 
Chair of the Real Estate Practice Group
Duval & Stachenfeld
 





Allen Ashley
 
Partner
DLA Piper
 





Jason Pantzer
 
Co-President
Pantzer Properties, Inc.
 





Jon Haahr
 
Senior Managing Principal
Silver Portal Capital
 





Jordan Socaransky
 
Principal
Westport Capital Partners, LLC
 










4:05 AM  FIFA World Cup Afternoon Refreshment Break, Courtesy of: 


Join us in the exhibit hall for caipirinhas and soccer as hosts Brazil tackle Croatia live from Sao Paolo in the tournaments opening match















8:54 PM  Fund Structuring 


                            • Current waterfalls (pooled) and fees for GPs • Fund JVs using separate accounts (opt-in clubs/ROFOs) • Flexibility in exit strategies • Side letter terms • Fund and investment period duration • GP exclusivity • GP co-invest requirement • Tax blocker structure flexibility (UBTI, ECI, REITs) • Reinvestment of proceeds •Distribution verification by accountants • Other new advisory committee demands
                            







Sandy Presant
 
Chair, Real Estate Fund Practice Group
Greenberg Traurig, LLP
 





Josh Carper
 
Executive Director, Finance
Greystar Real Estate Partners
 





Chris  Flick
 
SVP Portfolio Management
PIMCO
 





Peter Fish
 
Managing Director
Raymond James
 





Devon Archer
 
General Partner
Rosemont Realty
 





Steven Jasa
 
Vice President, Investment Management
Western National Properties
 










8:54 PM  Pending Debt Maturities… What is your Strategy for Loans Coming Due from the Class of 2005-6? 


                            A tsunami of maturities is now upon us, with about $1.7 trillion in loans coming due during the next 3 years. Many believe banks are not likely to extend more and borrowers will need alternative sources to refinance or recapitalize before rising interest rates get out of control. How can you take advantage of this once in a lifetime opportunity?
                            







Marshall Brozost
 
Partner
Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP
 





Tim Johnson
 
Managing Director
The Blackstone Group
 





Gil Tenzer
 
Partner & Director of Real Estate
Contrarian Capital Management, LLC
 





William Landis
 
Founder
Raith Capital Partners
 





Michael Maturo
 
President
RXR Realty
 





Bruce Batkin
 
President & Chief Executive Officer
Terra Capital Partners, LLC
 









The LP Plenary at IMN's Opportunity Fund Forum


                            High-Net-Worth, Private Banks, Family Officers, Fund-of-Funds, Pension Funds, Endowments & Foundations don’t miss the sessions dedicated to the LP by the LP. At the LP Plenary you will be presented with the key issues when evaluating and investing in real estate private funds. The LP Plenary at IMN’s Opportunity Fund Forum will be a separate track during IMNs Opportunity Fund forum and all opportunity fund attendees are eligible to attend. If you are an LP or want to hear they have to say this is a must attend plenary. The LP Plenary will be taking place for the next 5 sessions on track “C”
                            










8:54 PM  LP/GP Relations… The Alignment, The Fee, The Promote and the Incentive 


                            • Aligning Interests • Managing conflicts of interest • What are fair margins? • Fees for core vs. value-added • Largest issue, postfund formation • Follow-on funds •Management fees • Addressing conflicts of interest that do/should come up • Pre-2007, terms negotiating power was disproportionately in the managers’ favor, that shifted in 2009, where is it today? • What levers do we rely on to drive terms? Trade management fee for promote, promote for catch-up? • Where does transparency need to improve?
                            







Claiborne Johnston
 
Managing Director
Invesco Real Estate
 





Jahn Brodwin
 
Senior Managing Director
FTI Consulting
 





Jeff Kanne
 
President & CEO
National Real Estate Advisors, LLC
 





Adam Lesnick
 
Counsel
Seward & Kissel LLP
 





Bernie Werner
 
Managing Director
Transcendent Investment Management
 





Brooks Blake
 
Partner, Investments
Verdis Investment Management
 










8:54 PM  Foreign Fund Structures for LPs & GPs 


                            • Structural issues around FIRPTA • Structuring EB-5 into a fund • Sovereign wealth fund preferences • What you need to know about China • Joint venture partnerships • Latin American complexities • Parallel funds
                            







Stephen Land
 
Partner
Duval & Stachenfeld
 





Bryan York Colwell
 
Co-Founder/Managing Partner
LCN Capital Partners
 





Gregory Fournier
 
Managing Principal
Greenbrook Partners
 





David Warburg
 
Partner
Seyfarth Shaw LLP
 





Michael Schwartz
 
Director
WeiserMazars LLP
 










8:54 PM  Financing Small Deals 


                            • Are the small banks getting more aggressive? • Using SBA programs • Non bank and hard $$ lender terms • Using brokers • Exploring financings new frontiers: EB-5 Financing, crowdfunding, ifunding and the road ahead
                            







Andy Stewart
 
Managing Partner
Argosy Real Estate Partners
 





David Manshoory
 
Founder & CEO
AssetAvenue, Inc.
 





TR Hazelrigg IV
 
President
Avatar Financial Group
 





Darren Powderly
 
Co-Founder
CrowdStreet, Inc.
 





Jilliene Helman
 
Chief Executive Officer
RealtyMogul.com
 





Georgia Quinn
 
Associate
Seyfarth Shaw LLP
 










8:54 PM  Evaluating the Role of the Consultant 


                            • The LP perspective • Consultant or money manager? • How investment consultants can be a useful tool to GPs • How are you used by different investors? Large vs. small • Do you function as the LP CIO? • How do you evaluate a new fund? A debt fund? • Who do you recommend do separate accounts and club deals?
                            







Robert Insolia
 
Managing Partner
Goodwin Procter LLP
 





Poorvi Parekh
 
President and Chief Executive Officer
Canterbury Consulting
 





Joseph Wilhelm
 
Trustee
Hampshire County (MA) Retirement System
 





Stuart Elizabeth Baldwin
 
Principal
Hodes Weill & Associates
 





Leslie Greis
 
Managing Member
Perennial Capital Advisors, LLC
 










6:05 AM  Networking Reception Courtesy of 


IMN will be offering delegates a pair of free Maui Jim sunglasses during the Networking Reception.















7:05 AM  Day One Concludes 











8:54 PM  Breakfast for All Closed-Door Attendees Courtesy of 













8:54 PM  Closed Door, Vegas-Rules Discussion for New Funds 


                            With the casualty rate for new funds being so high IMN has organized a discussion focusing on both successful practices for putting together a new fund in 2014 as well as things that just didn’t work out the way you thought it would. This will be a fund only discussion where the agenda will come from you. Since space is limited please email gdzurenda@imn.org for confirmation.
                            







Steve Felix
 
Partner
Felix / Weiner Consulting Group
 





Steve Felix
 
Partner
Felix / Weiner Consulting Group
 










8:00 AM  Breakfast for all attendees Courtesy of: 












Please Choose "A, B or C"









8:54 PM  5 Markets, 45 Minutes: Evaluating the Major Markets 


                            Each speaker will address one single market, it’s critical factors and dynamics including pricing, cap rates, competition, investability and what inning the market is in.
                            







Stephen Rabinowitz
 
Chair, New York Real Estate
Greenberg Traurig, LLP
 





David Lynn
 
CEO
Everest Medical Properties
 





Michael Cohen
 
Director of Advisory Services
PPR, a CoStar company
 





Richard Kaufman
 
Founder and President
City-Core Development, Inc.
 





Chris Fraley
 
President
Evolve
 










8:54 PM  Buying NPLs & Sub-Performing Loans From Within the Capital Stack and from Banks and Servicers vs. The Rest of the Market: Where is there Value/Inventory Left? 


                            • Current pricing… Is the discount gone? • What types of assets are you finding? In what kind of locations? • Finding loans and REO • Are you examining the single family home market? • What kind of information are you getting from the banks? Is it enough? • Buying equity vs. debt • Stretch senior vs. senior mezz • Equity funds buying debt… What do your LPs say? • Securitized vs. whole loan debt • Impact of property type • June 12, 2014… What is your buy of the day?
                            







Michelle Kelban
 
Partner
Latham & Watkins
 





Ruprecht Hellauer
 
Managing Director
Albulus Advisors Germany GmbH
 





Tom Lockard
 
Vice President - Real Estate Investment & Institutional Sales
Fundrise
 





Yon Cho
 
Partner
Pacific Coast Capital Partners, LLC
 










8:54 PM  LP Asset & Real Estate Allocation 


                            • What are your current allocations? • Rebalancing 2015… Given the run-up in the equity and real estate markets are you looking to de-risk your portfolio? • Do you see core as a fixed-income substitute? • What is behind the black box of asset allocation models • Liability considerations
                            







Jonathan Glick
 
Managing Director
Incubation Capital Partners LLC
 





Paige Mueller
 
Director of Institutional Real Estate Advisory Services
RCLCO
 





Rodney Lumpkin
 
Portfolio Manager - Alternative Investments
SEI Investments
 





Greg Spick
 
Senior Portfolio Manager - Real Estate / Real Assets
UPS Investments
 










8:54 PM  Small Fund Survival Guide 


In an environment where many LPs are trying to consolidate their fund managers and brand names are in vogue many smaller managers need to work 10x as hard to succeed. This panel will discuss real-life examples of how small funds are raising money, getting high marks from investors, getting the word out, being transparent and getting superior returns• What is in your backyard… Is that the best way to invest? • Fundraising tips • Beyond friends and family • Can a generalist small manager succeed? • Joint ventures with institutional players • Playing up advantages i.e. personal attention, lower fees, nimble putting capital to work, and small amount of capital needed to get going
                            







Kenneth Weissenberg
 
Partner
EisnerAmper LLP
 





Tore Steen
 
CEO, Co-Founder
CrowdStreet, Inc.
 





Jason Isaacson
 
Founding Partner and President
IP Capital Partners, LLC
 





Bradford Lenox
 
Partner
Morris, Manning & Martin, LLP
 





William Procida
 
President
Procida Funding & Advisors, LLC
 





Nick Bienstock
 
Managing Partner
Savanna
 










8:54 PM  Senior Lending/Borrowing, Term Debt & Securitization 


                            • Impact of bank regulatory issues • Current debt yields • Funds as originators • Evaluating pricing risk • Gap capital • Impact of CDO return • What in the debt markets are keeping you up at night? • Time to go fixed? • CMBS market rates
                            







James Hisiger
 
Partner
Latham & Watkins
 





Nicki Livanos
 
Director, Real Estate Investments
AXA Equitable
 





Michael Eglit
 
Principal
Blackstone
 





David Douvadjian
 
Executive Vice President
Colliers International
 





Dean Dulchinos
 
Portfolio Manager – Debt Strategies
Cornerstone Real Estate Advisers LLC
 





Jeff Thompson
 
Managing Director, Institutional Accounts
GE Capital Real Estate
 










8:54 PM  LP/GP Panel on First Time, New and Emerging Managers 


                            • Defining the term “emerging manager” • What are you looking for from the new fund managed by the “#2” man? • How do you meet new managers? • Why do LPs have emerging manager programs? How have they performed? • Becoming a “graduated manager • How much of a percent of the fund would you invest in?
                            







Leo Leyva
 
Co-Chair of Litigation Dept. & Real Estate Special Op. Group
Cole Schotz, PC
 





Aaron Mesmer
 
Principal-Acquisitions
Block Real Estate Services, LLC
 





Danita Johnson
 
Vice President-Global Private Equity Real Estate
Franklin Templeton Investments
 





Maria Stamolis
 
Co-Head of Real Estate Investments
Canyon Partners Real Estate
 





Stephen Davidson
 
Vice President
Morgan Stanley Alternative Investment Partners
 





Jim Dillavou
 
Counsel/Principal
Paragon Commercial Group
 










8:54 PM  Housing Relative Value, Investments & Finance… 


                            • Impact of increasing interest rates • Is there still value in major markets or is it time for secondary market plays? • Class “A” or “B”… Where should you be? • What type of value-added situations are you currently looking at? • Fannie, Freddie and other government products you’ve been using • Valuations 2014 • Strategies to turn around under-performing properties • Can you make $$ on condos outside of New York and South Florida? • Land & lots… Has that ship already sailed? • Single family investments… Is there $$ that can still be made? • Multifamily… are we reaching the bubble stage anywhere? Are the condo players making it impossible to compete unless you want to make a 4 cap? • Homebuilding: A good play for today? • Will land prices continue to rise? • Master planned communities: Who is financing? • Infill locations • Residential joint ventures and their structures • Has the pickup in condos and the new single family rental market impacted rents?
                            







Ron Lagnado
 
Partner
WeiserMazars LLP
 





John Burns
 
CEO
John Burns Real Estate Consulting
 





Jeff Meyers
 
President
Meyers Research LLC
 





Preston Thomson
 
Director of Investor Relations
Nelson Brothers Professional Real Estate
 





Matthew Pestronk
 
President and Co-Founder
Post Brothers
 





Oliver Swan
 
Managing Partner
Treesdale Real Estate Partners
 










8:54 PM  Subscription & Short-Term Fund Financing 


                            • What are the current terms of subscription lines? • What other products are you offering? Repo lines? • How has fund evaluation changed? • Do you offer bridge loans? • Documentation trends • Handling a defaulted or non-performing customer • Impact of fund terms on asset class and strategy… Where are the biggest differences among lenders? • Issues for alternative structures
                            







Timothy Powers
 
Partner
Haynes and Boone, LLP
 





Matthew Alshouse
 
Partner
Baker & McKenzie, LLP
 





Tom Nowak
 
Managing Director
Bank of America Merrill Lynch
 





Jonathan Peiper
 
Director
Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation
 





Terence Hatton
 
Managing Director, Fund Finance
MUFG Union Bank
 





Dee Dee Sklar
 
Managing Director
Wells Fargo
 










8:54 PM  LP Manager Selection & Fund Due Diligence 


                            • Evaluating a new team from an old fund • How has the financial crisis and resulting performance struggles for real estate managers impacted track record analysis? • “Past returns are not indicative of future results,” how do we evaluate a manager’s prospective ability to be successful? • When would you invest with a manager with a mixed track record? How do we justify that investment internally • How useful are “on-list” reference checks? To what extent do we rely on “off-list” references • Track record attribution • How important is fund level vs. asset/deal level • Mortgage funds vs. hard assets-key differences
                            







Tommy Brown
 
Partner
LGT Capital Partners
 





Peter Madden
 
Director Americas Real Estate
APG Asset Management
 





Alisa Mall
 
Director of Investments
Carnegie Corporation of New York
 





Roland du Luart
 
Managing Partner - Head of US
LFPI
 





Sean Ruhmann
 
Partner-Director of Real Assets Research
NEPC, LLC
 





Amy Hirsch
 
Chief Executive Officer
Paradigm Consulting Services
 





Robert Greene
 
Vice Chairman
Virginia Retirement System (VRS)
 










8:54 PM  Refreshments Courtesy of 













8:54 PM  New/Small Fund Launches… What Managers Need to Know 


90% of new fundraises will not be successful. This session will help make sure you are in the 10% that are successful.• What to do before launching your first fund • Leaving a large fund… Recent success stories • Getting to the second meeting • Incubation funds • Effectively using placement agents and investment consultants • What should be in your “elevator pitch?” • How are you differentiating yourself? • Identifying your area of expertise • Dual fundraises • Exceeding target fundraises… What do these funds have in common? • SEC lift on general advertising… What have you been doing to get the word out? Implications on fund marketing materials • Using crowdfunding
                            







Randy Zisler
 
Chief Investment Officer
Encore Enterprises
 





Nevin Sanli
 
Founder & Managing Director
Astrum Investment Management
 





Paul Odland
 
Partner
Belveron Real Estate Partners
 





Jody Kriss
 
Principal
East River Partners
 





Jilliene Helman
 
Chief Executive Officer
RealtyMogul.com
 










8:54 PM  Construction & Development: What Issues Should you Concern yourself with During this Cycle? 


                            • Construction costs are rising… How are you dealing? • Joint ventures • As construction is picking up are you hiring in-house or outsourcing your expertise? • Mo’ construction; Mo’ problems… Managing multiple projects
                            







Deborah Levinson
 
Partner
CohnReznick LLP
 





Dave Pollin
 
Co-Founder
The Buccini/Pollin Group
 





Nicholas M. W. Hoffman
 
Partner
Haynes and Boone, LLP
 





Seth Schumer
 
Director, US Investments
Quadrum Group
 





Gregory Nero
 
Executive Vice President, General Counsel
Sterling Equities
 










8:54 PM  Secondary & Tertiary Markets 


                            • How deeply are you planning on going into secondary markets? • Are you starting to run into many of your competitors there? • How are you dealing with the lack of liquidity and the fact that if there are troubles the secondary markets are the first to lose value? • Asset classes you are looking at • Secondary markets outside of gateway cities… Is there a spillover? • What are you doing to protect yourself if secondary markets go down like the last cycle?
                            







Michael Cohen
 
Director of Advisory Services
PPR, a CoStar company
 





Jason Eisenberg
 
Principal
Apollo Global Management, LLC
 





Raphael Sidelsky
 
Senior Managing Director-Principal Investments
C-III Capital Partners
 





Paul Sisson
 
Managing Director, Head of Americas
CBRE Global Investors
 





Farid Guindo
 
Managing Partner
Drill Capital LLC
 










8:54 PM  Comparing the Allocator vs. Operator Model 


                            • Are investors ok with the double promote structure? • The local developer starting his own fund: How are LPs reacting? • Performance and historic returns • Evaluation beyond returns • Comparing fund structures • Capital fundraising for both models • Being both an operator and allocator
                            







Ronald Kaplan
 
Partner, Commercial Real Estate-Northeast Leader
CohnReznick LLP
 





Robert Morse
 
Chairman
Bridge Investment Group Partners
 





P.J. Yeatman
 
Head of Private Real Estate
CenterSquare Investment Management
 





Chris Niehaus
 
Partner
GreenOak Real Estate Advisors
 





Gary Block
 
Managing Director
The Meridian Group
 





Sujan Patel
 
Co-Head of US Investment Management
Colony NorthStar
 










8:54 PM  Exit Strategies and Liquidity Options: Where can you get the Most Bang for your Buck for your Current & Expiring Fund 


                            • Exit volume… Where is it going? • Fund strategy and exit issues • Positioning your property • Do you figure out the exit strategy upon acquisition? • Exit strategy planning up front • Exit cap rate assumption • Secondaries market… What is changing? • End of life options beyond predatory buyers • Exiting companies vs. properties • June 12, 2014… What is the best exit strategy today?
                            







Pike Aloian
 
Partner
Almanac Realty Investors, LLC
 





J. Stuart Mackintosh
 
Managing Director
EII Capital Management
 





Marty Caverly
 
Chief Investment Officer
Resource Real Estate
 





Paul Mehlman
 
Partner
Landmark Partners
 





Elliot Pessis
 
Vice President
Harrison Street | Real Estate Capital
 










8:54 PM  Joint Ventures… The Operating Partner Panel 


This plenary, from the operator view point, will discuss their view on joint ventures with funds. Discussions will include• Did you look for a partner or did your partner look for you? • Fees, carry, preferred structures • What is needed to be a “best in class” operating partner? • How do you present your track record? • 2015… Are you considering your own fund?
                            







David Eyzenberg
 
Principal – Debt, Joint Venture & Structured Capital
Avison Young
 





Joel Breitkopf
 
Partner
Alchemy Properties, Inc.
 





Pete Kutzer
 
Managing Partner
Edgewood Realty Partners, LLC
 





Kent Swig
 
President
Swig Equities
 





Chad Buchanan
 
Chief Investment Officer
Tryko Partners
 










8:54 PM  First-Time Funds… The Administration Side 


                            • Regulatory compliance • Calculating NAV • Evaluating new opportunities from the operational side • How much do you need in the piggy bank? Start-up costs • Corporate structure options • The launch • Investor communications and reporting: What is mandate; what your clients expect • Accounting tax and bookkeeping stuff • Regulatory filing • Co-investment and joint venture administration
                            







Howard Fields
 
Senior Vice President
Inland Institutional Capital Partners
 





Greg Myers
 
Managing Director
Cortland Capital Mark. Services
 





Daryl Shevin
 
Chief Financial Officer
13th Floor Investments
 





Barry Johnson
 
Managing Director, Global Head of Real Estate Operating Platform, Real Estate Fund Services
State Street
 





Desmond McGowan
 
Chief Financial Officer
True North Management Group, LLC
 










8:54 PM  Networking Luncheon with the Exhibitors 


Luncheon Roundtables:You will again be able to register for one of the roundtables is the series of luncheon roundtables at registration. Some of the scheduled roundtable will be New Funds, Multifamily, Young Professionals, Women in Real Estate, Small Funds, and General Counsel/CFO/COO.
                            









General Session









8:54 PM  Entering New Markets...Best Practices and Lessons Learned 


                            • How do you determine new markets? What are the reasons to move into new markets? • Defining the playing field and the players before entering a new market • Undertaking due diligence on new markets • Identify market entry point and market entry strategy  • When is it time to cut your losses in a new market?
                            







Linda Law
 
Principal
Law & Associates/Land Veritas
 





Michael Bernstein
 
Principal
Artemis Real Estate Partners
 





Eli Braha
 
Managing Member & CEO
Berkley Aquisitions LLC
 





Sondra Wenger
 
Managing Director
CIM Group
 





Terrell Gates
 
Chief Executive Officer
Virtus Real Estate Capital
 










8:54 PM  Where Will Cap Rates be in 3 Years? 5 Years? How is this Impacting your Underwriting? Investing in a Rising Rate Environment 


                            • Are you building more inflation protection into your agreements? • What asset classes do you expect to over-perform in a rising rate environment? • Markets…Gateway vs. primary vs. secondary • Are you making any tactical portfolio or asset-level changes to existing, inflation-sensitive investments? • Benefits of hedging • What are you going long on? Short on? • What is the most interest sensitive sector? • Are you locking into fixed rate debt? • Are you increasingly investing in cash flow focused properties? How will the Fed potentially exit quantitative easing and what are the risks? • Impact on investment style mandate tactical decisions (Core, value-add and opportunistic) • What future interest rate modeling scenarios are you using? What is your exit cap rate assumption relative to your going in cap rate? • Are there markets or product types where you expect NOI growth to offset or exceed the decline in residual value from higher cap rates? • Will the CRE buyer pool change when rates rise?
                            







Amachie Ackah
 
Founder
Clay Cove Capital
 





Tim Wang
 
Director & Head of Investment Research
Clarion Partners
 





Larry Raiman
 
CEO
LDR Capital Management
 





Russell Appel
 
President
Praedium Group, LLC
 





Jay Henry
 
Managing Member
TriGate Capital, LLC
 










4:05 AM  Wine & Cheese Reception 









5:00 PM  The 15th Annual Forum on Real Estate Opportunity & Private Fund Investing Concludes 












My Agenda

                Try out our new My Agenda feature. Save sessions of interest, print for onsite use and insert to calendar for auto reminders.
            




 
 



        NETWORK OPEN
    
 




Sign In
Email
Password
Remember me


   








Contact Information
INFORMATION MANAGEMENT NETWORK
1120 Avenue of the Americas, 6th Floor
                New York, NY 10036 USA

            Phone: +1 (212) 901-0506
(8:30 AM - 5:30 PM Eastern Time / Monday-Friday)

            E-mail:	mail@imn.org


Event Specific Contacts for 15th Annual US Real Estate Opportunity and Private Fund Investing Forum
                    



COOKIESThis page explains what cookies are, how we use them on the websites of the Euromoney Institutional Investor PLC group and your options for controlling them. Please note:Not all the cookies listed here will necessarily be used on each websiteWe will display our triangular red cookie prompt once when you visit each of our sites. If you send us a request as explained in the table below, this will apply to your use of all our sites so you only need to make one request.What are cookies?Cookies are pieces of information which include a unique reference code that a website transfers to your device to store and sometimes track information about you.  A number of cookies we use last only for the duration of your web session (“session cookies”) and expire when you close your browser. Other cookies are used, for example, to remember you when you return to the site and will last for longer (“persistent cookies”).  Cookies cannot be used to run programs or deliver viruses to your computer. They are uniquely assigned to your device and are sent back to the originating website on each subsequent visit (if they last longer than a web session) or to another website that recognises that cookie.Some of the cookies used by our sites are set by us, and some are set by third parties who are delivering services (such as interest based advertising and web analytics) on our behalf.What do we use cookies for?Some cookies are essential to enable you to move around the website and use its features, such as accessing secure areas of the website or areas with paid-for content. Without these cookies, services you have asked for, like shopping baskets, cannot be provided. Because such cookies are essential for using a site, these cookies cannot be turned off without severely affecting your use of the website.Other cookies perform various functions, as the table below explains, together with your options for controlling them.  Some cookies may also be controlled by using your web browser settings. Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set.You can also learn more about cookies in general by visiting www.allaboutcookies.org which includes additional useful information on cookies and how to block cookies using different types of browser.For more general information about online behavioural (interest based) advertising and how it uses cookies, you may wish to visit www.youronlinechoices.euOur cookies and your options:Type of cookieExampleWhat it doesYour optionsPerformanceBIGipServereuromoneyfxnews-poolThese cookies allow us to manage the technical performance of the website such as load balancing to ensure that the site is available to all users You may set your browser to reject these cookies but this is likely to affect your use of the siteFunctionalityISDefaultCurrencyThese cookies remember choices you make to improve your experience.  For example, they allow the website to remember selections such as language, currency, region or changes to text size and to remember you on return visits.  They may also be used, for example, to remember the point you have reached in a survey so that you can return to it later.  By choosing an option such as remember me, text size or participating in a survey or similar services that necessitate the use of a cookie, you will be indicating your consent to that cookie.   You may set your browser to reject these cookies but this is likely to affect your use of the siteActivity logging - websitesASP.NET_sessionIdThis cookie is essential to authorise your access to content and services that are not publicly available including paid-for content.  If you are a registered user, trialist or subscriber, when you log on, this places a cookie on your machine. Once you are logged on, we monitor your activity on our websites, for example, which articles you read.  This is for the following purposes: We need to ensure compliance with your user license and adherence to our terms and conditions as part of your trial or subscription.  (Our terms and conditions are published on our websites and can be accessed by a link in the footer of each page)For customer service purposes to provide users with a tailored service and to develop products and services reflecting our users’ needsIf you would prefer us not to use your activity log for customer service purposes, you can request that we anonymise it for these uses. This will affect our ability to understand your requirements and personalise your browsing experience in the future.Please note: If you are just browsing our sites without going through a log-in procedure, you will remain anonymous and we will not log your activity. To request anonymisation please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.comPlease include the following details:Your user name  that you use to access our website(s) – this will be an email addressYour nameYour company nameThe Euromoney website(s)  you use  Third party cookies:Third partyWhat it doesWhere to go for further information on these cookies including turning them offDoubleClickDoubleClick is a service provided by Google.  Its cookies are used to serve advertising relevant to users’ interests and measure the effectiveness of online marketing campaigns for our sites.    http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/ads/Google AnalyticsGoogle Analytics is a web analytics tool that helps us to understand how our users engage with our websites and so allows us to better tailor our websites to our users’ needs.The tool uses a cookie in order to evaluate use of content and compile reports for us on activity on our websites and Apps. https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptoutWebtrendsWebtrends is a web analytics tool that performs similar functions to Google Analytics in helping us to understand how our users engage with our websiteshttp://kb.webtrends.com/support/solutiondetail.aspx?Id=50140000000a79PAAQIf you would like further information or guidance on cookies, please contact us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com




TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF USE

            Below are the terms and conditions governing your use of EIMN, LLC ("IMN") this website and any products or services connected therewith. By using the website or services connected with the website, you acknowledge and agree to the following:

*Your Obligations. You represent and warrant that you have the capacity to agree to these Terms and you are at least eighteen (18) years of age. To the extent any individual accesses a Site or uses a Service as an employee, partner, director, agent or representative ("Agent") of any legal entity which is a Subscriber, the Agent warrants that he or she has authority to agree to these Terms on behalf of the relevant legal entity.

            You will procure that you and any licensed user under your subscription will: (a) comply with all applicable laws in relation to the site and services, including without limitation, laws relating to the use of Intellectual Property; (b) not use the site or the content outside the scope of permitted use and will not infringe any Intellectual Property or other rights in or relating to the site or the services or of any third party; (c) not copy, reproduce, recompile, decompile, disassemble, reverse engineer, upload, download, transmit, create derivative works from or otherwise exploit or tamper with the site or any software embodied in any site or service; (d) not prevent or restrict the use of any site or service by other authorized users nor hack into or cause damage to any server or other equipment operated by us; and (e) comply fully with these Terms.

*No IMN Warranties or Representations. IMN makes no warranty, express or implied, concerning any use of this website or any service or product provided in connection with this website. The services and products provided by IMN are provided on an "AS IS" basis. IMN disclaims any implied warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose, including any warranty for the use or the results of the use of the products or services. IMN is not responsible for correcting, maintaining or updating the data and services made available on this website.

            Any material and analysis provided by or through IMN or this website is not a recommendation that must be followed or an offer, or solicitation of an offer to buy or sell any financial product; IMN does not recommend that you enter into a particular transaction or represent that any product or service described on this website is suitable for you or your company. Nor is any information displayed here promoting any particular financial product, service or trading strategy in any jurisdiction where such an offer or solicitation, or trading strategy may be prohibited. As all prudent investors know, some transactions, including but without limitation, those involving high-yield securities, give rise to substantial risk and any investment decision you may make is your own. You should not enter into any transactions unless you have fully understood all such risks and have independently determined that such transactions are appropriate for you. Any discussion of the risks contained herein with respect to any product should not be considered to be a disclosure of all risks or complete discussion of the risks mentioned.

*Restricted Use. As a user of this website, you are not permitted to display, modify, copy, print or otherwise use the information made available to you here only for your own use. You are not permitted to publish, transmit, or otherwise make this information available in any format to any third party without the prior express written consent of IMN. You also are not permitted to change or remove any copyright (©), trademark (®, SM, TM) any other notices displayed with the information. IMN can modify the information at any time and for any reason at its sole discretion. Unless expressly stated otherwise herein, no rights are granted to you regarding the information on this website from IMN or any other source, including third party providers of information for this website, which shall under no circumstances be liable to you in any way.
            

*IMN Monitoring. Your use of the products and services on this Web site may be monitored by IMN in any lawful manner, and that the resulting information may be used by IMN for its internal business purposes or in accordance with the rules of any applicable regulatory or self-regulatory organization.
            

*Website or Internet failure. IMN shall have no liability, contingent or otherwise, to you or to third parties, or any responsibility whatsoever, for the failure of any connection or communication service to provide or maintain your access to this service, or for any interruption or disruption of such access or any erroneous communication between IMN and you. IMN also does not warrant or represent that the website shall be completely secure, specifically including without limitation, that no unauthorized person shall intercept or access information transmitted by you.
            

*Website Access. Access to this website is restricted by password and only authorized IMN registrants may use the website. Any unauthorized access shall be the responsibility of the Registrant and his or her company and IMN shall not be liable for any damages arising out of such unauthorized access. You agree to: (1) Keep your password confidential; (2) prohibit others from using your account; (3) refrain from using other Users’ accounts; (4) refrain from selling, trading, or otherwise transferring your account to another party; and (5) refrain from charging anyone for access to any portion of DirectConnect, or any information arising therefrom. You are also responsible for anything that happens through your account unless you can demonstrate that your account was accessed without your knowledge or fault.
            

*User Communication. To the extent permitted while using DirectConnect, you can use and participate in groups, free to post and delete comment on the website. You are solely responsible for your interactions with other users. IMN may limit the number of connections you may have to other users and may at its sole discretion prohibit you from contacting other users through use of the Services or otherwise limit your use of the Services.
            

            If you violate this Agreement while posting, that content may be removed without further notice or the rights of others posting here. Nothing you post here is confidential or proprietary and you are cautioned that other posters or viewers may use any information posted here. By posting here you agree that IMN is not responsible for the misappropriation or misuse of any information posted on this website.
            

*Privacy. Any submissions, including private personal information, like names, addresses and so on, are voluntary and you waive any and all rights you have to the protection of that information. By submitting ideas, suggestions, documents or other matter ("Submissions"), you agree that: (a) the Submissions are not confidential or proprietary information; (b) IMN has no obligation to keep the submissions confidential; (c) IMN can use or disclose the Submissions for any purpose, in any way, in any media worldwide; (d) if asked, you will irrevocably assign to IMN all rights to your Submissions; and (f) you are not entitled to any compensation of any kind from IMN under any circumstances.
            

*Content by Becoming a User of DirectConnect: As part of obtaining registration access to DirectConnect, unless you opt out, you may receive invitations to network from other conference attendees. We may also send you emails to keep you updated on developments in the site and services. Your registration for and/or subscription to such an email service and your use of the content received through these email services will be subject to these terms. You can unsubscribe to our email service by changing your email preferences on the website.
            

*License. If you comply with all your obligations under this Agreement, IMN grants you a limited, revocable, nonexclusive license and right to access the Services, through a generally available web browser, mobile device or application view information and use the web pages and in accordance with this Agreement for your use only. Any other use of DirectConnect is strictly prohibited. All rights not expressly granted in this Agreement, including, without limitation, title, ownership, intellectual property rights, and all other rights are retained by IMN.
            

*Anti-Hacking. You expressly agree not to use or attempt to use any "virus," "spyware," "malware," "adware," "Trojan horse" "deep-link," "scraper," "bot," "spider," "data-mining," "computer code" or any other automated device, program, tool, algorithm, process, or methodology or manual process having similar processes or functionality, to access, acquire, copy, or monitor any portion of this website or content. You also agree not to obtain or attempt to obtain through any means any materials or information on the website that have not been intentionally made available either by their public display on the Web Site or through their accessibility by a visible link or portal. You further agree not to violate the security of the website or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the website, data, materials, information, computer systems or networks connected to any server, through hacking, password mining or any other method.
            

*No Linkage. You expressly agree not to link or attempt to link to this website or the web pages contained herein.
            

*Third Party Information. Some of the information you access here is the property of third parties, made available here with the express permission of those third parties. IMN is not responsible for the content of any third party information provided on this website. You are cautioned that any further use of that information by you may be subject to the rights of those third parties and you may be required to obtain a license to use any such information. Failure to obtain third party permission may be a violation of federal law. You should contact the third party provider of the information to ascertain the requirements for using the information.
            

*Copyright and Trademarks. The layout of the website pages, graphics and pictures used and the collection of individual contributions are protected by copyright. All copyrights belong either to IMN, the third-party content providers or both. Either IMN or the third-party content providers own all trademarks and service marks depicted here.
            

*Indemnification. You agree to indemnify hold harmless and defend IMN, including our employees, officers, agents and contractors and our related entities and their employees, officers, partners, agents and contractors ("Indemnified") and continue to keep the Indemnified indemnified from and against any actions, proceedings, claims, demands, costs (on a full indemnity basis including, without limitation, reasonable legal and accounting fees) brought or made against the Indemnified by any person arising in connection with your use of the Website or content, or a breach of your representations and warranties in the Terms and Conditions of Use or this Agreement, or your violation of any of the Terms and Conditions of Use or this Agreement or any other activity in which you engage on or through, and from and against any damage, loss(whether personal or property, and whether direct or consequential, including without limitation consequential financial loss), cost or expense suffered or incurred by any Indemnified as a direct or indirect consequence thereof.
            

*Changes in Terms and Conditions. IMN may at any time revise the terms and conditions by which you may access the website or use IMN products or services. By using this website and IMN products and services, you agree to be bound by any such revisions and should therefore periodically visit this page to determine the then current version of this document.
            

*Limitation of Liability. Neither we, nor any of our suppliers, officers, employees, partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, successors and assigns, agents or representatives (our "Representatives") will be liable to you for:
            

            (a) any incidental, punitive, indirect, special or consequential damage, loss or expenses, including but not limited to any loss of business, contracts, revenue, or profits, any business interruption, security breach, loss of data, loss of goodwill or reputation or other pecuniary loss suffered by you, even if we or any of our Representatives have been advised of their possible existence; nor? (b) any direct damage loss or expenses arising from loss of customers, loss of profits, loss of anticipated profits or loss of savings.
            

*Termination. You may terminate this Agreement, for any or no reason, at any time, when IMN receives notice from you. IMN may terminate the Agreement and your account for any reason or no reason, at any time, with or without notice. This cancellation shall be effective immediately or as may be specified in the notice and may include disabling your current and future access to DirectConnect. IMN may also suspend or terminate this Agreement if you invite other users with whom you do not know to connect; abuse the any DirectConnect messaging services; creating multiple or false profiles; infringe on any intellectual property rights, violating any provisions in this Agreement, disparage IMN or its executives, Board members, affiliates, staff or other related entities or persons, or exhibit any other behavior that IMN, in its sole discretion, deems contrary to the purpose of the website.
            

*No Waiver. Failure by either party to exercise any right or remedy under these Terms does not constitute a waiver of that right or remedy.
            

*Entire Agreement. These terms (including any terms incorporated by reference in these terms), constitute the entire agreement between you and us with respect to your access to and use of the website or receipt of any service and supersede all prior agreements, negotiations and discussions between you and us relating to the same.
            

*Law and Jurisdiction. Where you visit, register and/or subscribe to a this site or related service (as indicated on this website or otherwise notified to you), these terms (and any dispute or claim arising out of or in connection with these terms, including non-contractual disputes or claims), to the maximum extent permissible under the law of the territory that you are located in, will be governed by the laws of the State of New York. Any action to enforce these terms shall be brought in a federal court or a state court located in the state of New York, county of New York, and you agree to submit yourself to the personal jurisdiction of those courts in any such action.
            

*Force Majeure. We shall not be deemed to be in breach of these Terms by reason of any delay in performing, or any failure to perform any service or our obligations in relation to these Terms, if the delay or failure was due to any cause beyond our reasonable control, including but not limited to acts of God, explosions, floods, fire or accident, war or threat of war, terrorism or threat of terrorism, sabotage, civil disturbance, epidemics, prohibitions or measures of any kind on the part of any governmental, parliamentary or local authority, import or export regulations or embargoes, or industrial actions or trade disputes (whether involving our employees or of third parties).
            

*Severability. If any provision of these Terms is found to be wholly or partially invalid, void or unenforceable by any court having competent jurisdiction or by virtue of any legislation or any other reason, that provision shall be invalid, void or unenforceable to that extent only and no further and the validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions of these Terms shall not be affected.
            

*Notices. Any notice given pursuant to these Terms shall be made by email or first class post, in the case of you, to the address provided on your registration form and, in the case of us, to the address posted on the website or otherwise notified to you in relation to any relevant service. Any such notice shall be deemed to have arrived if sent by post within three (3) days of posting and if sent by email at the time of transmission.
        



PRIVACY STATEMENT
Our Privacy Commitments

                Euromoney Institutional Investor PLC and Institutional Investor Inc. (together "we") respect the privacy of every person who visits, registers with or subscribes to our 
                websites and online publications ("you"), and are committed to ensuring a safe online experience.
                This Privacy Statement outlines the information we may collect about you in relation to your use of our websites and related publications and services ("personal data") and 
                how we may use that personal data. It also outlines the methods by which we and our service providers may (subject to necessary consents) monitor your online behaviour 
                in order to deliver customised advertisements and marketing materials and other tailored services. This Privacy Statement also tells you how you can verify the 
                accuracy of your personal data and how you can request that we delete or update it.
            
This Privacy Statement applies to all websites operated by us (as indicated on the relevant website) ("Sites"). For the purpose of this Privacy Statement 
                "group company" shall mean Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and any of its subsidiary companies, including, without limitation, Institutional Investor Inc. 
                Please note that the Sites may contain links to external sites and may contain advertisements for, and/or the opportunity for you to purchase products or services 
                from third parties. This privacy statement does not cover the activities of such third parties, and you should consult those third party sites' privacy policies for 
                information on how your data is used by them.By accessing and using the Sites you are agreeing to the terms of this Privacy Statement.
            

Information about us


                Our principal business activities are:
            

Business-to-Business Financial Publishing. We provide a range of products and services focused on international finance, metals, commodities, 
                    telecoms and emerging markets including magazines, newsletters, electronic information and data
Organisers of Seminars, Conferences, Training Courses and Exhibitions for the financial markets industry


                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc Company Address:
            

                Nestor House,
                Playhouse Yard,
                London EC4V 5EXUnited Kingdom
            

                Institutional Investor, Inc. Company Address:
            

                1120 Ave of the Americas, 6th floor
                New York, NY 10036
                USA
            

Name of the Data Controller


                The Data Controllers are Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and Institutional Investor Inc.
                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc is subject to the UK Data Protection Act 1998 and is registered in the UK with the Information Commissioner's Office.
            

Collection of Personal Data


                Our primary goal in collecting personal data from you is to give you an enjoyable customised experience whilst allowing us to provide services and 
                features that most likely meet your needs. We collect certain personal data from you, which you give to us when using our Sites and/or registering 
                or subscribing for our products and services. However, we also give you the option to access our Sites' home pages without subscribing or registering or 
                disclosing your personal data. We also collect certain personal data from other group companies to whom you have given information through their 
                websites (including, by way of example, Euromoney Institutional Investor plc and Institutional Investor Inc, in accordance with the purposes listed below).
                Please note that we do not intend to collect any personal data from children under thirteen years of age and no child under thirteen should submit any 
                personal data to any of the Sites. Should we discover that any such personal data has been delivered to any of the Sites, we will remove that information 
                as soon as possible.
            

Types of Personal Data Held and its Use

Customer Services and Administration

                At some Sites, Euromoney collects personal data such as your name, job title, work and/or home address, and telephone number and email address in order to 
                register you for access to certain content and subscriptions. This information may be supplemented with demographic information from your use of our Sites 
                such as your postal area, age, gender, purchasing preferences and interests. At other Sites, Euromoney may only collect broad demographic information 
                for aggregate use. This information is used to administer and deliver to you the products and/or services you have requested, to operate our Sites 
                efficiently and improve our service to you, and to retain records of our business transactions and communications. By using the Sites and submitting personal 
                information through the registration process you are agreeing that we may collect, hold, process and use your information (including personal information) for 
                the purpose of providing you with the Site services and developing our business, which shall include (without limitation) the purposes described 
                below in paragraphs 2 and 3.
            
 Monitoring use of our Sites

                Where, as part of our Site services, we enable you to post information or materials on our Site, we may access and monitor any information which you 
                upload or input, including in any password-protected sections. Subject to any necessary consents, we also monitor and/or record the different Sites you 
                visit and actions taken on those Sites, e.g. content viewed or searched for. If you are a registered user (e.g. a subscriber or taking a trial), when you 
                log on, this places a cookie on your machine. This enables your access to content and services that are not publicly available. Once you are logged on, 
                the actions you take - for example, viewing an article - will be recorded (subject to any necessary consents). We may use technology or a service provider 
                to do this for us. This information may be used for one or more of the following purposes:
            


to fulfil our obligations to you;
to improve the efficiency, quality and design of our Sites and services;
to see which articles, features and services are most read and used
to track compliance with our terms and conditions of use, e.g. to ensure that you are acting within the scope of your user licence;
for marketing purposes (subject to your rights to opt-in and opt-out of receiving certain marketing communications) - see paragraph 3 below;
for advertising purposes, although the information used for these purposes does not identify you personally. Please see paragraph 5 below for more details;
to protect or comply with our legal rights and obligations; and
to enable our journalists to contact and interact with you online in connection with any content you may post to our Sites.



                Please see paragraph 5 below for more information on cookies and similar technologies and a link to a page where you can turn them on or off.
            
 Marketing:

                Some of your personal data collected under paragraphs 1 and 2 above may be used by us and/or our other group companies and third party service 
                providers to contact you by email, fax, telephone and/or post for sending information or promotional material on our products and/or services and/or 
                those of our other group companies. We give you the opportunity to opt-out of receiving marketing communications and will in certain circumstances 
                need to obtain your consent before sending such communications to you. Further detail can be found on the applicable Site and in each marketing communication 
                sent by us, our group companies or service providers. See also "Consents and opt-outs" section below.
            
Trading in Personal Data:

                Some of your personal data may be collected and processed with the intention of selling it to other organisations, but this will not be 
                done unless you have given your consent (separately to this privacy statement).
            
Cookies and similar technologies

                All our Sites use cookies and similar technical tools to collect information about your access to the Site and the services we provide.
            

                Cookies are pieces of information which include a unique reference code that a website transfers to your device to store and 
                sometimes track information about you. A number of cookies we use last only for the duration of your web session and expire when 
                you close your browser. Other cookies are used to remember you when you return to the Site and will last for longer. Cookies cannot 
                be used to run programs or deliver viruses to your computer. They are uniquely assigned to you and can only be read by a Web server in 
                the domain that issued the cookie.
            

                We may use cookies to:
            

remember that you have used the Site before; this means we can identify the number of unique visitors we receive to different parts of the Site. 
                    This allows us to make sure we have enough capacity for the number of users that we get and make sure that the Site runs fast enough;
                
remember your login session so you can move from one page to another within the Site;
store your preferences or your user name and password so that you do not need to input these every time you visit the Site;
customise elements of the layout and/or content of the pages of Site for you;
record activity on our Sites so that we understand how you use our Sites enabling us to better tailor our content, services and marketing to your needs;
collect statistical information about how you use the Site so that we can improve the Site; and
gather information about the pages on the Site that you visit, and also other information about other websites that you visit, so as to place you in a 
                    “market segment”. This information is only collected by reference to the IP address that you are using, but does include information about the county 
                    and city you are in, together with the name of your internet service provider. This information is then used to place interest-based advertisements 
                    on the Site which it is believed will be relevant to your market segment. For more information about this type of interest based advertising, and 
                    about how to turn this feature off please visit www.youronlinechoices.co.uk. 
                    (Please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com if you have any queries about cookies)


                Some of the cookies used by our Sites are set by us, and some are set by third parties who are delivering services (such as interest based advertising 
                directed at your market segment) on our behalf. To see a list of the cookies and similar technologies used on this Site and instructions on how to 
                turn them on and off click here. 
                (Please email us at cookies@euromoneyplc.com if you have any queries about cookies) 
            

                Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set. 
                You can also learn more about cookies in general by visiting www.allaboutcookies.org 
                which includes additional useful information on cookies and how to block cookies using different types of browser. Please note however, that by blocking, deleting or 
                turning off cookies used on the Site you may not be able to take full advantage of the Site.
            

Email tracking: So that we can better understand our users' needs, we track responses to our emails - for example, to see which links are the 
                most popular in newsletters, and to log and follow up responses to our marketing messages. To do this, we use pixel GIFs, also known as "pixel tags" - these are 
                small image files that are placed within the body of our email messages. They enable us to tell if a message has been opened and to track click-throughs on links 
                within the message. Any other purposes for which Euromoney wishes to use your personal data will be notified to you and your personal data will not be used 
                for any such purpose without obtaining your prior consent.
            

Consents and opt-outs


                You can give your consent to or opt out of particular uses of your data as indicated above by:
            

Indicating at the point on the relevant Site where personal data is collected;
Informing us by email, post or phone; or
Updating your preferences on the applicable Site;


                For turning cookies and similar technologies on and off, see the information in paragraph 5 above.
            

Disclosures


                Information collected at one Site may be shared between Euromoney Institutional Investor plc, Institutional Investor Inc. and other group companies for the 
                purposes listed above. Your personal data may also be sold to other companies in the form of lists and directories, but only after permission from 
                you in accordance with the provisions above. We may also disclose your personal data to other third parties, including, without limitation, professional 
                advisers, or governmental or State institutions or regulatory authorities, where necessary in order to exercise or defend legal rights or where required by law.
            

                We may transfer, sell or assign any of the information described in this policy to third parties as a result of a sale, merger, consolidation, change of control, 
                transfer of assets or reorganisation of our business.
            

Public forums, message boards and blogs


                Some of our Sites make message boards, blogs or other facilities for user generated content available and users can participate in these facilities. 
                Any information that is disclosed in these areas becomes public information and you should always be careful when deciding to disclose your personal information.
            

Transfers outside the EEA


                Services on the Internet are accessible globally so collection and transmission of personal data is not always limited to one country. 
                Euromoney Institutional Investor plc may transfer your personal data, for the purposes listed above, to other group companies, service providers or other 
                third parties which may be located in countries outside the European Economic Area, whose laws may not give the level of protection to personal data as within the UK. 
                This will include transfers to Institutional Investor Inc. in the US (and Institutional Investor Inc. will collect some data directly from you, in relation to the 
                Sites which it operates) and to third parties who provide us with email and marketing services. Where we conduct any transfers we will take all steps reasonably 
                necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
            
Confidentiality and Security of Your Personal Data
We are committed to keeping the data you provide us secure and will take reasonable precautions to protect your personal data from loss, misuse or alteration.
The transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the 
                security of your data transmitted to our Site; any transmission is at your own risk. Once we have received your information, we will use strict procedures and 
                security features described above to try to prevent unauthorised access. We have implemented information security policies, rules and technical measures to 
                protect the personal data that we have under our control from:

unauthorised access
improper use or disclosure
unauthorised modification
unlawful destruction or accidental loss

All our employees, contractors and data processors (i.e. those who process your personal data on our behalf, for the purposes listed above), who have access to, and 
                are associated with the processing of your personal data, are obliged to keep the information confidential and not use it for any other purpose than to carry out 
                the services they are performing for us. We also give you the option of using a secure transmission method to send us personal data identifiers, such as 
                credit card details and bank account number. How to Access, Update and Erase your Personal Information


                If you wish to know whether we are keeping personal data about you, or if you have an enquiry about our privacy policy or your personal data held by us, in 
                relation to any of the Sites, you can contact the Data Protection Officer via:
            

Postal mail to this address: Data Protection Officer, Euromoney Institutional Investor plc, Nestor House, Playhouse Yard, London EC4V 5EX, UK
Telephone: +44 (0)20 7779 8600
Email: 
dataprotectionofficer@euromoneyplc.com


Upon request, we will provide you with a readable copy of the personal data which we keep about you. We may require proof of your identity and may charge a 
                small fee (not exceeding the statutory maximum fee that can be charged) to cover administration and postage.
Euromoney allows you to challenge the data that we hold about you and, where appropriate in accordance with applicable laws, you may have your personal information:

erased
rectified or amended
completed

Changes to this Privacy Statement
We will occasionally update this Privacy Statement to reflect new legislation or industry practice, group company changes and customer feedback. 
                We encourage you to review this Privacy Statement periodically to be informed of how we are protecting your personal data.
This Privacy Statement was last updated in April 2012.






                This  email already exists, please use "Forgot Password" page to reset a password for an existing account.
                

(Click "Reset Password" button below and email with password reset instruction will be emailed to you.)







                This  email you entered is not in valid format.
                






Reset Password
Email






 






Impact & Highlights | Partnership for New York City
































































































The Partnership Fund




Impact & Highlights
Impact


 Expanding Opportunities
Grameen America: The Partnership Fund provided financing to Grameen to support the expansion of its micro-lending operations in New York. To date, over $115 million in 54,000+ loans has been disbursed in New York – helping to lift more than 15,000 women out of poverty.
Hot Bread Kitchen: This Harlem-based nonprofit prepares immigrant and low income women for jobs in the culinary industry, funding those operations through a revenue-generating bakery that sells ethnic breads inspired by its bakers. Founder Jessamyn Rodriquez has been honored with Clinton Global Initiative’s “Global Citizen Award” and former Mayor Bloomberg’s “American Dreamer Award.” The Partnership Fund financed equipment purchases and provided Hot Bread with working capital.
The Doe Fund: Their 400-bed transitional residence in East Williamsburg, Brooklyn – which the Partnership Fund helped to finance – is providing counseling and education to help homeless adults secure jobs and independent housing.
Greenpoint Manufacturing & Design Center: Headquartered in Brooklyn, GMDC is a non-profit real estate development company that creates and preserves affordable manufacturing space in NYC. The Fund has made three separate loans to GMDC, which enabled GMDC to develop properties in Greenpoint, Crown Heights and East Williamsburg, Brooklyn. GMDC currently owns and manages five properties, which together represent more than 700,000 square feet of space. These buildings are occupied by more than 110 businesses that employ over 600 people. Tenants include woodworkers, makers of home furnishings, food manufacturers, garment companies, metal workers, and a variety of artisanal trades, artists and designers.
Fostering Growth
FinTech Innovation Lab graduates have raised over $310 million in follow on funding and have created over 380 jobs.
Creditex: The Partnership Fund’s extensive support for the NYC fintech sector included a direct investment in Creditex, an electronic trading platform for credit derivatives.  The company was acquired by Intercontinental Exchange (ICE) in 2008 for over $500 million. ICE owns and operates a global electronic marketplace for trading in futures and over-the-counter commodities.  At the time of its acquisition, Creditex had 150 employees in New York.
SchoolNet: The Partnership Fund was an early supporter of the NYC ed tech sector with our investment in SchoolNet, a company whose enterprise solutions software for K-12 enable schools to collect, integrate and analyze key data to boost academic outcomes. In 2011, Pearson, the multinational education publishing company, acquired SchoolNet for $230 million. At closing, SchoolNet employed 65 people in NY.
New York Digital Health Accelerator graduates have raised over $230 million in follow on funding to date.
Intracellular Therapies: Investing to catalyze growth in the life sciences sector in New York City, the Partnership Fund provided capital to this early stage company which is developing vital, new drugs to treat diseases of the central nervous system (including Alzheimer’s, Parkinson’s, schizophrenia and depression).  An initial public offering in February 2014 raised over $100 million for the company. Since going public, ITCI raised an additional $345mm of equity in September 2015.
Promote Public Sector Innovation
The Partnership Fund has committed $40 million to catalyze the life sciences sector and spur commercialization of research emerging from NYC’s world class academic institutions.
New York Genome Center: Established with a mission to transform biomedical research and clinical care, the NY Genome Center — opened in 2013 — enables an unprecedented collaboration of technology, science and medicine to power innovation and discovery to save and improve people’s lives. Public, nonprofit and private supporters — including the Partnership Fund — have joined together to provide more than $100 million in funding for this vital center for genomic research and medicine. institutions.
NYC Bike Share: NYC Bike Share is a privately-owned public bicyle sharing system that serves NYC. The Partnership Fund’s investment is funding expansion to high-need communities in Harlem, Bedford-Stuyvesant and Crown Heights, among others.






Learn MoreAbout the Partnership Fund
Investment Criteria
Submit a Proposal
Current Portfolio
Programs
Impact & Highlights
Sector Advisory Boards and Volunteers
Fund Board of Directors
Investors
Our Team
 










News






07.27.17
Statement on Governor Cuomo’s Public-Private Partnership Transit Initiative





07.27.17
Partnership Fund portfolio company Petra Pharma Corporation appoints CEO and scientific leadership team





07.25.17
Statement on the MTA’s 30-Day Plan





07.06.17
Statement from the Partnership for New York City on DEIS Release for the Gateway Program





06.29.17
Statement from the Partnership for New York City in Support of Extension of Mayoral Control





06.22.17
FinTech Innovation Lab Celebrates Seventh Anniversary, Entrepreneurs Debut Breakthrough Technologies in Cybersecurity, A.I. and Fraud Detection





06.20.17
Statement from the Partnership for New York City in Support of Governor Cuomo’s Proposal to Give State Control of MTA Board





06.19.17
New York Building Congress and the Partnership for New York City Unite Industry Leaders to Support Design-Build





06.13.17
Statement from The Partnership for New York City on Charter Schools and Mayoral Control





06.08.17
Over 100 Business Leaders Call for Extending Mayoral Control





05.16.17
Partnership for New York City Calls on State Lawmakers to Address Mayoral Control, Charter Schools and Design-Build Legislation





04.27.17
Partnership Fund Portfolio Co. New Lab featured in NYTimes piece on Brooklyn’s “Hardware Renaissance”





04.13.17
Partnership Fund for New York City CEO Maria Gotsch Interviewed on BBC Radio





04.12.17
CME Announces FinTech Innovation Lab Alum AlphaPoint as Technology Provider for New Gold Trading Initiative





04.11.17
Joint Statement from Business & Research Leaders on Commitment to Life Sciences in State Budget





04.06.17
Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Varney & Company





04.04.17
New York’s Top Business Leaders and Largest Private Sector Employers Meet with President Trump





04.03.17
Statement from the Partnership for New York City on  Meetings with President Trump and on Capitol Hill





03.30.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership of New York City, Supporting Commercial Rent Tax Relief





03.30.17
The Partnership for New York City Mourns the Passing of Our Founder, David Rockefeller





03.30.17
Crain’s New York Business – Remembering David Rockefeller: Not the Royalty I Expected





03.06.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Governor Cuomo’s Announced Partnership Between New York Genome Center and Technion-Israel Institute of Technology Supporting Life Sciences





03.05.17
Partnership Fund Investment Kings County Distillery is Featured in Crain’s





02.16.17
FinTech Innovation Lab Graduate OpenFin Raises $15 Million Series B Round





02.13.17
Partnership Fund Portfolio Company Celmatix Named in Fast Company’s Top 50 World’s Most Innovative Companies





02.09.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On High Earners Tax Increase at Joint Legislative Budget Hearing





02.07.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Senate Bill to Create NYC Tax Reform Commission





01.27.17
Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, Discusses President Trump’s Impact on the Business Community





01.26.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Assembly Democrat’s High Earners Tax Proposal





01.24.17
What’s Next in Health Tech Presented at the New York Digital Health Accelerator Demo Day





01.24.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Garodnick Commercial Rent Tax Legislation





01.18.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Governor Cuomo’s “Millionaire’s Tax” Extension





01.12.17
Partnership Fund Direct Investment and FinTech Innovation Lab Graduate Kasisto Raises $9.2M in Funding





01.10.17
Testimony by Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on The Economic Impact of Increased Security for the President-Elect upon Local Businesses and the City as a Whole





01.09.17
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Governor Cuomo’s State of the State Address





01.04.17
New Report & Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Governor Cuomo’s JFK Airport Plan





12.10.16
Partnership Fund Investment New Lab Featured as an Integral Part of Brooklyn’s Industrial Revolution





12.08.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On New York City Being Designated “Top Performer”  by Governor Cuomo’s Regional Economic Development Council





12.08.16
CEO of Celmatix, Partnership Fund Portfolio Company, Named Disruptive Founder of the Year





12.01.16
Partnership Fund Investment Lodo Therapeutics Named in Top 10 Startups to Watch





11.14.16
Maria Gotsch, President and CEO of the Partnership Fund for New York City Named in 2016’s Fintech Finance 35





11.02.16
Kathryn Wylde and Winston Fisher on WCNY’s Capitol Pressroom





10.26.16
Partnership Fund Investment Kasisto Announces Partnership with Mastercard





10.24.16
Accenture, Partnership Fund for New York City and Leading Banks Call for Applicants for New York FinTech Innovation Lab 2017





10.14.16
Partnership for New York City Announces 2016-2017 Class of David Rockefeller Fellows





09.29.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City,  On Governor Cuomo’s Unveiling of New Pennsylvania Station Farley Complex





09.26.16
CEO of EpiBone on CNBC





09.22.16
Michael Simas’ Testimony to the Committee on Education of the New York City Council





09.14.16
Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, Inducted into Crain’s Hall of Fame





09.13.16
Partnership Fund for New York City and New York eHealth Collaborative Announce Companies Selected for the 2016 Digital Health Accelerator Program





09.09.16
American Prison Data Systems Honored in Annual “Best for the World” Awards





08.30.16
Bounce Exchange Named Fastest Growing Software Company





08.15.16
Fund Investment Profiled in Vanity Fair





07.01.16
VIDEO: Fund President and CEO Discusses Partnering with Startups at CB Insights Event





06.29.16
FinTech Lab Graduate Kasisto Releases New Banking Products





06.24.16
Eight Innovative Startups Showcase Cutting-Edge Financial Technologies at Sixth Annual FinTech Innovation Lab Demo Day in New York City





06.22.16
Fund Investment ‘New Lab’ Opens at Brooklyn Navy Yard





06.22.16
Partnership Fund Releases New Report on Life Sciences in NYC





06.22.16
Wall Street Journal Features Fund’s New Report on Life Sciences





06.20.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde on One Year Extension of Mayoral Control:





06.16.16
Partnership Fund Participates in Rgenix $33 million Series B Round





06.14.16
FinTech Lab Graduate Enigma Named in “11 Hottest Startups” List





06.06.16
Top Employers Gather to Discuss Mental Health in the Workplace





06.06.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Majority Leader Flanagan’s Mayoral Control Bill





06.03.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Business Regulation Council





06.03.16
Partnership Fund for NYC and New York eHealth Collaborative Announce Call for Applications for New York Digital Health Accelerator 2016 Class





05.24.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Senate Task Force on Workforce Development Report





05.19.16
Testimony by Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayoral Control of Schools in New York City





05.18.16
Top New York City Business Leaders Urge Albany to Pass Long-term Extension of Mayoral Control





03.31.16
New #PromoteTheVote Campaign Aims to Increase Turnout for NY Presidential Primary





03.24.16
Partnership for New York City Calls for More Study of MoveNY Congestion Pricing Plan





03.07.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Decline in Wall Street Bonuses





03.07.16
Impending NJ Transit Strike Would Cost NYC Employers $5.9 Million per Hour of Delay





02.16.16
Private Sector Jobs At All-time High, Led by Professional & Financial Services





02.09.16
Testimony by Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mandatory Inclusionary Housing and Zoning for Quality and Affordability





02.04.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor’s State of the City Address





02.02.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Education Tax Credit and Charter School Increase





01.29.16
Partnership Convenes Breakfast Honoring Jay Fishman





01.26.16
Maria Gotsch, President and CEO of the Partnership Fund for New York City, interviewed for The Economist Intelligence Unit





01.25.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, Re: City Council Hearing on Quality of Life Offenses





01.21.16
Six Innovative Digital Health Tech Companies Present Cutting-Edge Solutions  at the New York Digital Health Accelerator Demo Day on January 21





01.21.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Maria Vullo, Nominee for DFS Superintendent





01.13.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on GE Headquarters Decision





01.13.16
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Governor Cuomo’s State of the State





01.12.16
NYC Seed’s first Seedstart program Datadog raises $94.5 million in Series D funding





01.11.16
Partnership Fund invests in Lodo Therapeutics, Accelerator Corp’s second NYC biotech startup





01.11.16
Partnership Fund President and CEO Maria Gotsch talks fintech with Institutional Investor





01.06.16
Partnership Fund invests in Petra Pharma Corp, fueling biotech sector in NYC





12.17.15
Partnership Celebrates Year in Review





12.17.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on HOME-STAT





12.16.15
Testimony by Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Mandatory Inclusionary Housing and Zoning Plans





12.15.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor de Blasio’s Homeless Services Review





12.10.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Common Core Task Force Report





12.10.15
Partnership expresses commitment to a welcoming city in today’s New York Times





12.09.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on World Trade Center Development





12.03.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Fixing America’s Surface Transportation Act (FAST Act)





11.24.15
Kathryn Wylde Op-Ed in City & State





11.19.15
Partnership for New York City Releases Third Quarter Economic & Quality-of-Life Indicators





11.18.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor de Blasio’s Supportive Housing Initiative





11.13.15
Stephen A. Schwarzman Announced As Incoming Co-Chair of the  Partnership for New York City





11.12.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Gateway Funding Agreement





11.05.15
Partnership for New York City Launches Innovation Council





10.26.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on New NYC Criminal Background Check Law





10.21.15
Accenture, Partnership Fund for NYC and Leading Banks Call for Applicants for New York FinTech Innovation Lab 2016





10.20.15
Partnership member BlackRock hosts Global Innovation Summit Featuring Five of the Partnership Fund’s Fintech Innovation Lab Companies





10.19.15
Partnership Fund Portfolio Company Hot Bread Kitchen Featured on the TODAY Show





10.10.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on MTA Funding Agreement





10.06.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Comptroller DiNapoli’s Wall Street Report





10.01.15
Partnership for New York City Announces 2015-2016 Class of David Rockefeller Fellows





09.29.15
Partnership Fund Life Sciences Portfolio Company, Accelerator Corporation, Completes $62.8 Million Oversubscribed Financing





09.25.15
Partnership Fund President and CEO Maria Gotsch Featured in Wearables Digital





09.21.15
The Partnership and New York Magazine Host “The New New York”





09.21.15
Partnership for New York City Endorses Mayor de Blasio’s Five-Borough Ferry Service Plan





09.15.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Cuomo-Christie Gateway Project Commitment





09.10.15
Partnership Fund’s New York Digital Health Accelerator Announces Selected Companies for 2015 Program





09.09.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Reported Proposal for a $15 NYS Minimum Wage





08.26.15
Partnership Fund Portfolio Company OwnEnergy Acquired by EDF Renewable Energy





08.10.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Judge’s Decision to Void the Responsible Banking Act





08.10.15
Watch: Partnership Fund Makes Additional Investment in Hot Bread Kitchen





08.05.15
The Partnership Fund proudly supports the expansion of Citi Bike





08.03.15
Partnership Fund Portfolio Company and FinTech Alum, Digital Reasoning, in the News





07.27.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Governor Cuomo’s LaGuardia Redesign and Plans to Improve Other Regional Airports





06.25.15
Seven Innovative Startups Present New Financial Technologies at New York’s 2015 FinTech Innovation Lab Demo Day





06.24.15
Partnership President & CEO Kathryn Wylde on NY1 Inside City Hall





06.23.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on  Provisional End-of-session Agreement in Albany





06.18.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on House Passage of Trade Bill





06.17.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, On Disability Pensions for NYC’s Uniformed Employees





06.15.15
New Report: NYC Remains the World Financial Capital, but New Regulations, High Costs, & Growing Competition Threaten the Future of Wall Street





06.10.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on City Council’s Fair Chance Act





06.09.15
Large Employers from Across the Country Urge Congress to Pass Trade Bill – Partnership for New York City Announces Coordinated Campaign With Leaders from California, Colorado, Iowa, Minnesota, New England, Oregon, Pennsylvania & Washington





06.05.15
PHOTOS: Breakfast Meeting With Governor Cuomo





06.02.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Letter of Intent to Build a New Skyscraper at 2 World Trade Center





06.01.15
Top New York City Business Leaders Come Out In Support Of Gov. Cuomo’s “Parental Choice in Education Act” To Increase School Choice Options For Middle & Lower Income Households – Urge NYS Senate Majority Leader Flanagan and NYS Assembly Speaker Heastie to Reach Bipartisan Compromise On Tax Credit





05.28.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Port Authority Board’s Decision to Begin Redevelopment of LaGuardia Airport





05.28.15
Top New York City Business Leaders Urge NYS Senate Majority Leader Flanagan & NYS Assembly Speaker Heastie to Reach Bipartisan Compromise To Extend Mayoral Control of City Schools for At Least Three Years





05.27.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Commercial Rent Tax Proposal Introduced Today in the City Council





05.22.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Senate Passage of Trade Promotion Authority Bill





05.18.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for NYC, on Proposed NYC Council Legislation on Commercial Rent Tax





05.12.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Today’s Senate Vote to Block Trade Promotion Authority





05.11.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on New York State Advertising Campaigns, Including START-UP NY





05.07.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor Bill de Blasio’s Executive Budget and Capital Plan 





05.06.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor de Blasio Signing the Credit Check Bill into Law





05.05.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor’s Center for Youth Employment





05.01.15
Top New York City Business Leaders Urge New York State Congressional Delegation to Support TPA Bill Moving Through Congress – Majority of NYS Congressional Delegation Has Opposed TPA; Business Leaders Urge Them To Reconsider Opposition





04.30.15
Partnership Fund Makes Investment in New Lab





03.06.15
Partnership for New York City Releases 2015 State Budget Priorities





02.12.15
Partnership for New York City Seeks Changes to Credit Check Legislation





02.03.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor de Blasio’s 2015 State of the City





01.31.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Assembly Leadership





01.22.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Governor Cuomo’s 2015 Education Agenda





01.21.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Governor Cuomo’s 2015 Opportunity Agenda





01.18.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Governor’s Tax and Minimum Wage Announcement





01.11.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Appointment of Bill Mulrow





01.08.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Senate Passage of the Terrorism Risk Insurance Program Reauthorization Act (TRIA)





01.07.15
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the House of Representatives Passage of the Terrorism Risk Insurance Reauthorization Act (TRIA)





12.12.14
NYC Business Community Comes Out in Support of Antonio Weiss Nomination for Under Secretary for Domestic Finance





12.11.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, in support of the Swaps Push-Out Provision in the Omnibus Appropriations Bill





11.19.14
NYSE Acquires True Office, Developer of Interactive Game-Style Training and Graduate of the Fund’s FinTech Innovation Lab





11.13.14
Two Graduates of the Fund’s FinTech Innovation Lab Class of 2014  — Kasisto and Standard Treasury–  named on American Banker’s as Top 10 Tech Companies to Watch list





10.28.14
The Partnership Fund’s $5M investment in Bikeshare Holdings LLC supports Citi Bike’s expansion into underserved communities in Brooklyn, Queens and Upper Manhattan





10.23.14
The View on Real Estate: Kathryn Wylde on the MTA’s budget gap





10.22.14
The View on Real Estate: Kathryn Wylde on Wall Street’s decline





10.22.14
The View on Real Estate: Why a pied-a-terre tax is not a good idea





10.20.14
New York FinTech Innovation Lab Calls for Leading-Edge Financial Technology Entrepreneurs to Participate in 2015 Program





10.16.14
Yahoo Signs Long Term Power Purchase Agreement with Portfolio Company, OwnEnergy





10.16.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on the Tax Foundation Awarding Governor Cuomo Their 2014 Outstanding Achievement in State Tax Reform





10.13.14
Portfolio Company, Digital Reasoning — graduate of the Fund’s ‘FinTech Innovation Lab’–  raises $24M in Series C Round led by Goldman Sachs & Credit Suisse NEXT Investors





10.10.14
Partnership for New York City Announces 2014-2015  Class of David Rockefeller Fellows





10.09.14
Goldman Sachs turns to Portfolio Company, Digital Reasoning — graduate of the Fund’s ‘FinTech Innovation Lab’– to catch rogue bankers





10.03.14
Partnership Fund’s Digital Health Accelerator Gives Much-Needed Boost to Health IT Startups





09.30.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Executive Order to Expand Living Wage Law





09.10.14
Portfolio Company, Cureatr—graduate of the Fund’s ‘NY Digital Health Accelerator’—wins over big user





09.02.14
The Partnership Fund’s ‘FinTech Innovation Lab’ recognized for contributing to the rapid growth in NYC’s fintech sector





08.20.14
Portfolio company, Kasisto –  graduate of the Fund’s ‘FinTech Innovation Lab’ – secures $2.25M in financing to expand footprint in financial services market





08.07.14
Philadelphia Mayor Michael Nutter thinks his city makes more sense than NYC for 2016 Democratic National Convention





07.24.14
Entrepreneurs showcase the latest at the Partnership Fund’s inaugural Demo Day for the NY Fashion Tech Lab





07.23.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Standard and Poor’s Upgrade of New York’s General Obligation Credit Rating to AA+





07.22.14
CEOs Call Upon the House Republican Leadership to Promptly Pass Reauthorization of the Terrorism Risk Insurance Act (TRIA)





07.22.14
The Partnership Fund’s ‘NY Digital Health Accelerator’ Announces Program’s 2014 Class of Entrepreneurs





07.17.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO at the Partnership for New York City, on Passage of Senate Bill (S.2244), the Terrorism Risk Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2014





07.09.14
The Partnership for New York City applauds passage of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act





07.09.14
Joint Statement from Partnership for New York City and Long Island Association Regarding MTA-LIRR Labor Negotiations





06.30.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President and CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on today’s development regarding immigration reform legislation





06.26.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City,  on Bank of New York Mellon’s Decision to Move Headquarters Downtown





06.26.14
Entrepreneurs showcase cutting edge technologies at Partnership Fund’s 2014 FinTech Innovation Lab Demo Day





06.26.14
The Partnership Fund and Accenture’s new report highlights NYC as fastest growing market for financial technology in U.S.





06.24.14
Partnership Meeting with Governor Andrew Cuomo





06.16.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City,  on Moody’s Investment Services Upgrade for New York





05.29.14
Kimberly Spell Joins the Partnership for New York City As Executive Vice President of Communications





05.28.14
Partnership Meeting with NYC Council Member Julissa Ferreras





05.22.14
Partnership Holds Board Meeting at NY Genome Center with Mayor Bill de Blasio





05.01.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City,  on Tentative Contract Between City and UFT





04.02.14
NYC Jobs Blueprint: NYC Is A Growing Tech Hub





03.25.14
The Partnership Fund for New York City and Springboard Enterprises Launch the New York Fashion Tech Lab





03.11.14
Reform Business Taxes Now





03.06.14
Partnership Fund’s NY Digital Health Accelerator Accepting Applications for 2014 Class





02.12.14
Statement from Kathryn Wylde, President & CEO of the Partnership for New York City, on Mayor de Blasio’s Fiscal Year 2015 Preliminary Budget



>
<


































Marquis Energy, LLC | Better Buildings Initiative
















































Skip to main content










 

 





Contact UsTwitterLinkedInPartnershipsBetter Buildings Initiative HomeBetter Buildings AcceleratorsBetter Buildings AllianceBetter Buildings ChallengeBetter Buildings Home Energy ScoreBetter Buildings SummitBetter Buildings SWAPBetter Buildings WorkforceBetter Communities AllianceBetter Plants Program & Better Plants Challenge50001 Ready 














 


 

 
 







PartnershipsMeet PartnersBrowse Partner MapsSee all Partner Headquarters Find Partner Showcase Projects View all Partners See Partner ListsFind Partners by Location Browse Partners by Better Buildings Programs View Partners in A-Z List SolutionsEvents & WebinarsEventsEvents listEvents calendarWebinarsSpecial: Better Buildings Webinar SeriesSee all WebinarsNewsroomSummitSWAPAbout 

 
















 


You are hereHome » Partnerships » Marquis Energy, LLC








  
 Marquis Energy, LLC  

 

 



Marquis Energy, LLC


Share


 







  
  
  Marquis Energy, LLC is a corn-based ethanol producer located in Hennepin, Illinois. Founded in 2007, the company produces approximately 140 million gallons of ethanol each year for domestic and international markets. Much of the feed value of the corn used at the plant is returned to the livestock industry as dried distiller's grains. The company produces approximately 380,000 tons of these grains each year, along with five million gallons of corn oil.
NAICS 325, Chemical Manufacturing
Date of Pledge: January 2012
  

 












 



 

 
 

 












